Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that this budget proposal reflects the ongoing challenges budget writers encounter in addressing the State of Washington's transportation system needs. Factors like ballooning project costs, bridge failures, and roads in disrepair put considerable pressure on transportation revenues that, despite recent tax increases, continue to trend downward. Resources attributed to the Climate Commitment Act are also expected to wane over time.As the legislature awaits the results of mediation between the Attorney General's Office and Tribes in Washington State to implement the next phase of culvert restoration, the budget writers have determined that now is not the time for further bond authorizations, which may limit the ability of the legislature to address foreseen and not yet foreseen transportation needs.Recognizing the necessity to invest more in the state's aging infrastructure, this budget proposal increases preservation and maintenance spending this biennium and provides an additional $500 million in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, demonstrating the legislative commitment to prioritizing preservation and maintenance now and in the future.With respect to the state's ferry system, this budget proposal commits to ongoing efforts to construct new vessels and maintain existing levels of service. In lieu of funding three additional ferries in this budget, the budget writers propose a process through which the Joint Transportation Committee will make recommendations to address our ferry system needs, including options to fund those recommendations in the context of all the state's transportation system needs.(End of part)GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIESâOPERATINGSec. 101. 2025 c 416 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,530,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,551,000Sec. 102. 2025 c 416 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERSPilotage AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,706,000Sec. 103. 2025 c 416 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCILMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($987,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,012,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000Sec. 105. 2025 c 416 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,460,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,460,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 417, Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). ((If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section lapses.))(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâOPERATINGSec. 201. 2025 c 416 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSIONHighway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,794,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,847,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($39,998,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,001,000Highway Safety AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000School Zone Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$850,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($51,102,000))Â Â Â Â Â $61,158,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $600,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to purchase telematics data from a qualified vendor that provides anonymized information on vehicle speeds and driver behaviors, such as hard braking, on a statewide basis and in selected geographical areas based upon demographic characteristics and crash history. The commission must provide an annual report summarizing findings from the telematics data to the transportation committees of the legislature beginning by June 30, 2025, and until June 30, 2027.(2) $1,500,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for dedicated probation or compliance officers at the local level to improve compliance with ignition interlock device installation requirements associated with impaired driving offenses. The commission must select locations based on an assessment of ignition interlock device compliance rates, and the willingness and ability to have staff dedicated to this activity. The commission must provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a preliminary status report on the specific locations selected and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by June 30, 2027.(3) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a multifaceted approach to supplement existing funding targeted at impaired driving and other enforcement. The areas of emphasis expected to be funded include additional high visibility enforcement and indigenous knowledge-informed tribal traffic safety support. Funding is also provided for the commission to administer and provide oversight of these activities. The commission must provide a preliminary report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on these funded activities and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by December 1, 2026.(4) $350,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to complete an annual report on impacts of the automated traffic safety cameras used in the state as required in RCW 46.63.220(6)(b)(ii), beginning July 1, 2026.Sec. 202. 2025 c 416 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDRural Arterial Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,059,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,058,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,532,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,567,000County Arterial Preservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,549,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,548,000County Road Administration Board Emergency LoanNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$267,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,440,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within appropriated funds, the county road administration board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The county road administration board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) $2,500,000 of the rural arterial trust accountâstate appropriation and $2,500,000 of the county arterial preservation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a grant program to assist counties and cities with the costs associated with obtaining a new federal highway administration load rating for bridges to accommodate legal loads as authorized under RCW 46.44.041.(3) $3,000,000 of the county road administration board emergency loan nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the board to award emergency loans for repairs and restoration of roads and bridges to counties and cities that experienced flooding, landslides, and infrastructure damage as a result of historically high rainfall levels in western Washington in December 2025. It is the intent of the legislature that communities awaiting federal funding relief have access to emergency loans to more rapidly begin repairing county roadway sections or structures that were severely damaged, destroyed, or substantially restricted to normal use due to the natural event. It is also the intent of the legislature to revisit the amounts appropriated in this section after data is collected and available from counties and cities for consideration in the 2027 legislative session.Sec. 203. 2025 c 416 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARDComplete Streets Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$163,000Transportation Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,771,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,876,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,039,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the transportation improvement board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The transportation improvement board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.Sec. 204. 2025 c 416 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEECarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($624,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,264,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,379,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,688,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($350,000))Â Â Â Â Â $850,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,353,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,802,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $75,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, in collaboration with the facilities program within the department of transportation, to evaluate the cost and benefits associated with having the facilities program take on full responsibility for planning and support of some or all of the facilities currently operated by the Washington state ferries. The joint transportation committee must provide a preliminary assessment, including any recommendations, by December 1, 2025. The joint transportation committee must prepare a final report, including any recommendations, by October 1, 2026.(2) $390,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), for the following activities:(a) $250,000 is to contract with the association of Washington cities for the contracting for a facilitator for the process of updating the memorandum of understanding reached by the association of Washington cities and the Washington state department of transportation in 2013 for the construction, operations, and maintenance responsibilities for city streets as part of state highways. With the help of the facilitator, a work group must be convened to collaborate on updating the agreement and developing recommendations for maintaining the agreement. Work group participants must consist of six members representing cities, appointed by the association of Washington cities, and six members of the Washington state department of transportation. The final work of the facilitated process must be completed by June 2027.(b) $140,000 is for the joint transportation committee to contract for an update to the 2019 assessment of city transportation funding needs to assess the current state of city transportation funding, identify emerging issues, and recommend funding sources to meet current and future needs. The association of Washington cities and the Washington department of transportation shall provide technical support to the study. The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by September 2026.(3) $75,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to continue the alternative project delivery methods and innovative practices study under section 204(9), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The next phase of the study must provide additional consultation on collaborative procurement and contracting approaches that may be used by the Washington state department of transportation in public works contracting to increase contract competition and support containing costs and project delivery schedule. A supplemental report on findings and recommendations, including any changes in current practice and statutory requirements, is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(4) $274,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated for the joint transportation committee for a study of the impacts of implementing California's emissions standards for ocean-going vessels at berth in Titles 13 and 17 of the California Code of Regulations in Washington. The joint transportation committee must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(5) $250,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to contract with the Freight Policy Transportation Institute of Washington State University to serve as the independent review team to work in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation's analysis, funded in section 217(5) ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025, of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail.(a) The department shall include the independent review team in all phases of the analysis to enable the team to develop an independent assessment of the analysis, assumptions, stakeholder engagement, and cost and impact estimates. Summary findings from the independent assessment must be provided to the department, the governor's office, and the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis, with an end of biennium report due to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(b) The independent review team must conduct an independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be formed to provide data and guidance to the independent review team for the independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be made up of stakeholders, including farming and agricultural production, fishing industry, tug and barge operators, shippers and receivers, public ports, railroad operators, cruise lines, the federal highway administration, and the army corps of engineers. Consultations with federally recognized tribes must also occur in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation.(c) The independent review team shall make regular presentations to the joint transportation committee and, by request, to the transportation committees of the legislature.(6) $200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study and make recommendations on alternative new methods for local governments to fund sidewalk improvements, including but not limited to establishing a sidewalk utility. The study must review revenue options utilized in other states and make evaluations based on fairness, stability, adequacy, regressivity, simplicity, and the effect on economic vitality. The joint transportation committee must submit a preliminary report of findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2025. A final report is due to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(7) $250,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to review and evaluate administrative, performance, and delivery efficiencies for alternative fuel and zero emission vehicle and vessel and infrastructure programs and other transportation electrification programs funded under the climate commitment act. As part of its review, the committee must analyze previously and currently funded programs under the omnibus operating, capital, and transportation appropriations acts. By October 1, 2026, the committee must provide to the transportation committees of the legislature a report on evaluation findings and recommendations on improvements to program delivery, including the consolidation of any programs, and as to which agency or agencies are appropriate and optimal to administer such climate commitment act funded programs.(8)(a) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to continue its contract with a national expert on developing inclusive, mixed-income, mixed-use transit-oriented housing to complete a review of transit-oriented development conditions in cities in King, Pierce, Spokane, Clark, and Snohomish counties as described under section 204(13), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(b) The review must also analyze transit-oriented development housing supply and affordability strategies within chapter 267, Laws of 2025, and include any recommendations on how such legislation may be most effectively implemented by local governments. The contracted party shall provide its review to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2025.(9) $100,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee the development of tools and methodologies to assist in program delivery evaluation for fuel conversion activity programs that receive appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account. Program delivery evaluation must include carbon emissions reduction estimates by program and by unit of time, program cost per unit of emission reduction, quantified benefits to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities by program cost, any additional appropriate qualitative and quantitative metrics, and actionable recommendations for improvements in program delivery. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2025.(10) $640,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to continue to oversee the development and use of the carbon emission reduction tracking tool developed to assist in program delivery evaluation for fuel conversion activity programs that receive appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account, where "fuel conversion activity programs" include the purchase of zero emission or hybrid electric vehicles, vessels, or off-road equipment, and the charging or fueling infrastructure needed to support zero emission or hybrid electric vehicles or vessels. Tool development and use activities may include, but are not limited to, tool administration, hosting, maintenance, support, enhancements, quality assurance activities, and a tool redesign for better integration of user data and data export capabilities.(11) $300,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to contract with Washington State University's Freight Policy Transportation Institute for the following activities:(a)(i) $200,000 to conduct a study of off-hour gate operations at the container terminals operated jointly by the ports of Seattle and Tacoma. The study should consider the following:(A) The cost to the terminal operating entities associated with shifting hours of operation to an off-peak schedule;(B) Cost savings to the state resulting from reduced transportation impacts of freight movement if an off-peak schedule is adopted;(C) Other costs and benefits to the state from the adoption of an off-peak schedule;(D) Emission reductions and other environmental benefits and costs that could result from adoption of an off-peak schedule;(E) Costs and benefits to shippers and beneficial cargo owners;(F) Impacts to key supply chain partners involved in freight movement, through interviews conducted by the joint transportation committee and Washington State University;(G) Impacts to other supply chain partners, including, but not limited to, labor partners, warehousing, trucking, rail, and transloading; and(H) Strategies that could support participation of supply chain partners in an off-peak schedule.(ii) A final report shall be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.(b)(i) $100,000 to review the existing methodology for designating Washington state department of transportation freight and goods transportation system (FGTS) and the freight mobility strategic investment board's strategic freight corridors. The review should include:(A) Recommendations for incorporating improved freight and economic data including, but not limited to, data on economic impacts, performance, tonnage, volume, resiliency, safety, and supply chain impacts;(B) Recommendations on streamlining and utilizing collected data to designate FGTS and strategic freight corridors;(C) An assessment of whether any new data collection, recording, and sharing capabilities of the Washington state department of transportation or local jurisdictions would be necessary to implement recommendations made; and(D) An assessment of whether any statutory changes would be required to implement recommended methodology changes.(ii) A final report of findings and recommendations shall be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(12) $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, in collaboration with the department of transportation, to convene a work group on terminal improvements, vessel procurement, and ferry asset preservation in order to develop a long-range vessel sufficiency and asset management plan.(a) The legislature finds that maintaining the state's marine highway system is of critical importance to the citizens of Washington state and that the aging condition of the state's vessel fleet requires action now to ensure replacement assets are in place to avoid service interruption and reduced service levels.(b) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(i) The secretary of transportation or the secretary of transportation's designee;(ii) Joint transportation committee executive committee members or their designees; and(iii) A representative from the office of financial management.(c) The committee may contract with a third-party consultant for work group support. The committee may contract with a consultant specializing in naval architecture and marine engineering to provide neutral technical expertise to the work group.(d) In developing a plan for long-range vessel sufficiency and ferry asset management, the work group shall:(i) Prioritize approaches that, at a minimum, avoid loss of service, as defined by no reduction in planned service and no reduction to the total number of vessels actively in service or undergoing maintenance and preservation activities as of 2026;(ii) Include in its considerations the environmental benefits and impacts, life cycle costs, and risks associated with technology and design alternatives;(iii) Analyze and provide recommendations on industry standards and best practices for alternative vessel types, propulsion systems, and fuels;(iv) Evaluate options for upgrading and modifying existing aging vessels and consider to what extent upgrading and modifying existing aging vessels is a viable supplemental strategy to avoid service interruption and the effective use of available resources; and(v) Evaluate procurement and contract delivery options, including leasing, as well as parameters and schedule needed to avoid degradation of service.(e) The work group shall evaluate sustainable funding and financing options, including leasing, certificates of participation, and bonding, that prioritize the avoidance of both a multi-year gap in service and loss of service delivery. The work group shall evaluate the financial feasibility of these options, among ferries accounts as well as the broader state transportation budget, taking into consideration other constraints in meeting long-term delivery expectations.(f) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.Sec. 205. 2025 c 416 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,105,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,119,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$488,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$178,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$368,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,289,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,303,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(((2)))(1) Within the parameters established under RCW 47.56.880, the commission shall review toll revenue performance on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor and adjust Interstate 405 tolls as appropriate to increase toll revenue to provide sufficient funds for payments of future debt pursuant to RCW 47.10.896 and to support improvements to the corridor. The commission shall consider adjusting maximum toll rates, minimum toll rates, day-of-week rates and time-of-day rates, and restricting direct access ramps to transit and HOV vehicles only, or any combination thereof, in setting tolls to increase toll revenue. The commission is encouraged to make any adjustments to toll rates in coordination with the planned expansion of express toll lanes between the cities of Renton and Bellevue.(((3)))(2) The commission must evaluate and consider temporary toll rate adjustments for the state route number 99 tunnel to support management of increased demand leading up to and during the 2026 World Cup.(((4)))(3)(a) $200,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation and $200,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the commission, in coordination with the department of transportation, to conduct a pilot or pilots of advanced tolling technology provided by the private sector. The purpose of this pilot or pilots will be to assess the viability and accuracy of advanced technologies that may reduce the implementation and long-term costs of the toll system or enable more flexible operations. The commission shall retain a separate independent third-party vendor or vendors who can provide expert oversight, guidance, and advisement on the work, including: The pilot design; the evaluation plan; data analysis; and reporting on findings.(b) A final report of findings is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2026. The report must, at a minimum: Outline the technology tested; provide a comparison of system performance, operations, costs, and revenue collection efficiencies between the test system or test systems and the roadway toll system in use today; assess the requirements for achieving compatibility with the existing back-office system; provide a summary of how lessons learned from the pilot or pilots were incorporated into the planned procurement of new roadside toll systems; and provide recommendations on next steps.(((5)))(4) The commission shall partner with the department of transportation to design and implement a toll relief program based upon income qualification. Implementation must start with facilities where tolling begins in fiscal year 2026 or later. The commission shall work with the department of transportation to assess potential impacts of extending the toll relief program based upon income qualification to existing tolled facilities that opened prior to fiscal year 2026. The assessment, at a minimum, must determine potential impacts to meeting current financial and legal requirements in place for each facility. The commission, in partnership with the department of transportation, shall provide annual updates on the program to the transportation committees of the legislature.(((6)))(5) The commission shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon regarding toll rates and exemptions. Prior to finalizing tolling proposals, the commission shall advise on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee beginning in September 2025 and quarterly thereafter until any agreements are finalized.Sec. 206. 2025 c 416 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARDFreight Mobility Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,412,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,418,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the freight mobility strategic investment board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2025 and 2026 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction. The freight mobility strategic investment board may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.Sec. 207. 2025 c 416 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$42,000State Patrol Highway AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($710,586,000))Â Â Â Â Â $728,779,000State Patrol Highway AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($24,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,990,000State Patrol Highway AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$4,603,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,276,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,275,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,705,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,704,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$328,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$90,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$274,000I-405 and SR 167 Express Toll Lanes AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,894,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($755,799,000))Â Â Â Â Â $773,979,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $580,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2023, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the fiscal quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025.(2)(a) $250,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the activities of a vehicle registration pilot program in the Puget Sound region. The pilot program must emphasize compliance with annual vehicle registration requirements. By February 15, 2026, the Washington state patrol must provide a status report on pilot program implementation.(b) The Washington state patrol must provide information on the funding needed and a preliminary plan for statewide implementation of activities related to ensuring compliance with annual vehicle registration in the report under (a) of this subsection.(3) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.(4)(a) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;(iv) The composition of workforce;(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years; and(vi) Activities related to the implementation of the agency's workforce diversity plan, including short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach, and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.(b) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must conduct two surveys regarding the competitiveness with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington pursuant to RCW 43.43.380, with the first survey being informational regarding the change since the last survey was conducted and the second survey used as part of the collective bargaining process. Prior to the 2026 legislative session, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must also provide comparison information regarding recruitment bonus amounts currently being offered by local law enforcement agencies in the state.(5)(a) (($8,504,000))$11,337,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities.(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six-month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the chief information officer, the report must be transmitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(6)(a) $2,610,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enhancing the state patrol's diversity, equity, and inclusion program, a community engagement program to improve relationships with historically underrepresented communities and to recruit and retain a diverse workforce, and contracting with an external psychologist to perform exams. The state patrol must work with the state office of equity and meet all reporting requirements and responsibilities pursuant to RCW 43.06D.060. Funds provided for the community engagement program must ensure engagement with communities throughout the state.(b) The state patrol may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(7)(a) $7,552,000 of the ((state patrol)) highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the work zone speed safety camera pilot program with the amounts for specific activities as follows:(i) $2,353,000 for the Washington state patrol's oversight, administrative, overtime, and other costs associated with the processing of work zone speed violations;(ii) $3,990,000 for interagency reimbursements to the office of administrative hearings for adjudication related expenses associated with work zone speed violations; and(iii) $1,209,000 for interagency reimbursements to the office of attorney general for legal guidance and adjudication related expenses associated with work zone speed violations.(b) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol, in conjunction with the other agencies involved in the work zone speed safety camera pilot program, must report on the number of deployments and locations, workload, violations issued, detailed expenses incurred by each agency in the pilot program, and efficiency measures each agency is taking in operating the pilot program in the most cost-effective manner possible.(8) $1,668,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for three accelerated training programs for lateral hires. It is the intent of the legislature that the three accelerated training programs for lateral hires offered in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium achieve at least 30 qualified graduates based on the Washington state patrol aggressively recruiting, advertising bonus policies, and taking other steps to achieve this outcome.(9) By December 1, 2026, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of McClain v. Washington State Patrol and an update on legal expenses associated with the case.(10) $7,572,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ((one additional trooper basic training class with troopers graduating in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding to initiate an additional trooper basic training class with troopers graduating in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium))additional trooper basic training classes starting or graduating in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(11) Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol must offer a minimum of 14 emergency vehicle operator courses per year at its Shelton driving track exclusively for basic law enforcement academies offered by the criminal justice training commission.(12) It is the intent of the legislature to address any demographic disparities that might exist regarding traffic stops initiated by troopers, including traffic stops of indigenous motorists. Therefore, within the amounts provided in this section, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the joint transportation committee by October 1, 2025, detailing the demographic breakout of traffic stops for each of the most recent three calendar years for which data is available. The report must include counts and per capita rates for each demographic group on: (a) Traffic stops; (b) verbal warnings; (c) written warnings; (d) citation issuance; (e) arrests; and (f) searches. The joint transportation committee must hold a work session on the traffic stop report by December 15, 2025. If deemed warranted, the joint transportation committee shall make recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature on future funding adjustments or other actions necessary to address any demographic disparities identified in the report.(13) $800,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increased chain enforcement on Interstate 90 in the area around Snoqualmie Pass. The legislature intends that the Washington state patrol, pursuant to RCW 46.37.005, require commercial vehicles to carry chains statewide during winter months and, in coordination with the department of transportation, develop a process for monitoring compliance at weigh stations.(14) $3,500,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to address emergent issues that may arise due to the high level of commissioned and noncommissioned vacancies. Potential uses of the funding include the following: Employee leave buyouts, increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels, unanticipated facility and equipment needs, increased overtime, travel, and other related costs.(15) (($3,000,000))$1,600,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for hiring additional staff ((and)), increased overtime, increased contracting to maintain adequate service levels, purchasing equipment, and other related costs for the toxicology laboratory to reduce the DUI processing backlog, with the expectation that processing times will be reduced. Beginning December 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the state patrol must report on the activities undertaken and planned with the funding provided in this subsection and current DUI processing times compared to those as of June 2025.(16) (($4,500,000))$9,300,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for updates and improvements to the agency's wide area and local area network. The office of financial management, in consultation with Washington technology solutions, must actively monitor the expenditure of funds provided in this subsection to ensure that the state patrol is staying within the scope, schedule, and budget of the project and has adequately addressed issues identified by Washington technology solutions in its review of the budget request. These issues include the appropriate phasing of the equipment replacement, conducting a cost-benefit analysis of leasing versus purchasing the equipment, and the utilization of existing state patrol staff compared to contracting for certain functions and activities to achieve the desired outcomes. The office of financial management may unallot any unused funding or pause the project at any time based on its assessment and monitoring.(17) $5,000,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to enhance the vehicle replacement cycle for higher mileage vehicles in the agency's fleet.(18)(a) $3,644,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs, advertising, outreach, and bonus payments associated with developing and implementing a state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program for the purpose of recruiting and filling vacant trooper positions in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The legislature is committed to continuing the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program until the vacancy levels are significantly reduced from current levels. The recruitment, advertising, and outreach associated with this program must continue efforts to create a more diverse workforce and must also provide an accelerated pathway for joining the state patrol for high quality individuals who have previously been employed as a general authority peace officer.(b) The state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program must include:(i) Thorough hiring procedures to ensure that only the highest quality candidates are selected as cadets and as lateral hires, including extensive review of past law enforcement employment history through extensive reference checks, Brady list identification, and any other issues that may impact the performance, credibility, and integrity of the individual;(ii) An accelerated training program for lateral hires from other agencies that recognizes the knowledge and experience of candidates previously employed in law enforcement; and(iii) A sign-on bonus for each trooper hired through the expedited recruitment incentive program as follows:(A) $5,000 for each cadet after completion of the Washington state patrol academy;(B) $5,000 for each successful graduating cadet after completion of a one-year probation period;(C) $8,000 for each lateral hire after completion of the accelerated training program for lateral hires;(D) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of a one-year probation period; and(E) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of two years of service.(c) The expenditures on the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program are contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.(d) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Cadet" means a person employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the Washington state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.(ii) "Lateral hire" means an eligible employee previously employed as a general authority peace officer.(19) (($2,178,000))$1,865,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the bonus policy for commissioned staff who reach 26 or more years of service in the Washington state retirement system pursuant to chapter 237, Laws of 2024.(20) $600,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staffing and security equipment for Washington state patrol to staff the international border crossing and provide support for the department of homeland security, during the months of June and July 2026 for the purposes of the World Cup, to facilitate border crossings and screening against human trafficking, narcotics trafficking, unlawful crossings, and other unlawful activity.(21) $304,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2637), Laws of 2026 (PRA/personal information). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2637), Laws of 2026 is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(22) $998,000 of the state patrol highway accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staffing and other related costs to support video coordination and processing for public disclosure and discovery requests. Within this funding the department must research and evaluate technology and automation enhancements to gain efficiency and reduce costs.Sec. 208. 2025 c 416 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGDriver Licensing Technology Support AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,765,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,680,000Marine Fuel Tax Refund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,000Motorcycle Safety Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,382,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,419,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($495,000))Â Â Â Â Â $509,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($289,511,000))Â Â Â Â Â $300,472,000Highway Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,311,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($94,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,529,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,336,000Ignition Interlock Device Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,831,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,837,000Department of Licensing Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($8,585,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,694,000License Plate Technology AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,223,000Abandoned Recreational Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,109,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,083,000Limousine Carriers AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $147,000Electric Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$459,000DOL Technology Improvement & Data ManagementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($968,000))Â Â Â Â Â $967,000Agency Financial Transaction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,317,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,699,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,506,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,471,000Driver's Education Safety Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($10,460,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,143,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($446,583,000))Â Â Â Â Â $456,013,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation and $1,100,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of providing driver's license support. In addition to support services required under RCW 74.13.338(2), support services may include reimbursement of:(a) The cost for a youth in foster care of any eligible age to complete a driver training education course, as outlined in chapter 46.82 or 28A.220 RCW;(b) The costs incurred by foster youth in foster care for a motor vehicle insurance policy;(c) The costs of roadside assistance, motor vehicle insurance deductibles, motor vehicle registration fees, towing services, vehicle maintenance, comprehensive motor vehicle insurance, and gas cards; and(d) Any other costs related to obtaining a driver's license and driving legally and safely.(2)(a) $2,200,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for organizations providing driver's license assistance and support services.(b) By December 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must submit information on the contracted providers, including: The annual budget of the contracted providers in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the providers; and a description of the number of people served, services delivered, and outcome measures.(3) Within existing resources, the department must continue to issue nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals under the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program in accordance with sections 217(2) and 208(20), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(4)(a) (($3,109,000))$5,083,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.(b) Within the amounts appropriated under this subsection, the department, after consulting with abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program participants, must assess current practices and reimbursement rates associated with the fiscal sustainability of the program. By December 1, 2025, the department must submit a financial plan demonstrating sustainability for a minimum of two subsequent fiscal biennia at current or proposed fee rates.(((6)))(5) The department shall report on a quarterly basis on licensing service office operations, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued and renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued and renewed. By November 1, 2025, the department must update a report with recommendations on the future of licensing service office operations based on the recent implementation of efficiency measures designed to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times, and the implementation of statutory and policy changes.(((7)))(6) $6,000 of the motorcycle safety education accountâstate appropriation, $1,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $406,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation, $137,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving accountâstate appropriation, and $6,000 of the department of licensing services accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of licensing for additional finance and budget staff. By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific steps the department has taken to address the findings of the State Auditor's Office FY2022 Accountability Audit Report No. 1032793.(((8)))(7) $50,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing and administering a per mile fee program. The study must identify the staffing and resources needed to implement and administer the program, including possible technical investments, leveraging existing technology platforms. The legislature intends to require a final report that includes potential third-party costs and options to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(((9)))(8)(a) (($300,000))$600,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into an interagency agreement with the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs to contract with one or more private nonprofit organizations with appropriate expertise and experience to provide REAL ID compliance support to residents of the state who are compact of free association citizens, comprised of citizens of the Federated States of Micronesia, the Republic of the Marshall Islands, and the Republic of Palau, by providing the following assistance using a culturally and linguistically appropriate approach:(i) Communication and community outreach activities to inform compact of free association citizens of federally acceptable identification options that will be required and for which they are eligible for the purposes of domestic air travel once the REAL ID Act policy takes effect;(ii) Case management assistance through the use of community navigators who can provide assistance in the process to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including in obtaining any documentation necessary for the application process; and(iii) For those who meet the requirements of (b) of this subsection, financial assistance to obtain federally acceptable identification documents that will be required for the purposes of domestic air travel when the REAL ID Act policy is in effect, including financial assistance to obtain a foreign passport.(b) To qualify for assistance under (a)(ii) of this subsection (((9)))(8), a compact of free association citizen who resides in the state of Washington must be:(i) A recipient of, or eligible for, public assistance under Title 74 RCW; or(ii) A participant in, or eligible for, the Washington women, infants, and children program.(((10)))(9) $173,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 332, Laws of 2025 (improving collector vehicle regulations). ((If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5127), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(12)))(10) $44,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of ((chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410), Laws of 2025 (veteran parking privileges) or)) chapter 295, Laws of 2025 (veteran parking privileges). ((If neither chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410), Laws of 2025 or chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1371), Laws of 2025 are enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(13)))(11) $4,971,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 385, Laws of 2025 (special license plates). ((If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5444), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(14)))(12) $36,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2025 (vehicle inspection backlog). ((If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5462), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(15)))(13) $64,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 217, Laws of 2025 (blood type information). ((If chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5689), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(16)))(14) $150,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to send periodic notifications to vehicle owners with significantly expired vehicle registrations to increase compliance with annual vehicle registration requirements. Notifications must contain information about vehicle registration requirements and possible penalties associated with operating a vehicle with an expired registration.(((17) $726,000))(15) $638,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 417, Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). ((If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.)) Of this amount:(a) (($256,000))$331,000 is provided solely for the implementation of new revenues; and(b) (($470,000))$307,000 is provided solely for the department to implement a program to compensate registered tow truck operators for private property impounds.(((18)))(16) $50,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to translate the driver licensing examination manual and knowledge test into Dari, Farsi, and Somali.(((20)))(17) $106,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 175, Laws of 2025 (driver training alternative). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (House Bill No. 1244) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(21)))(18) $1,081,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 228, Laws of 2025 (speeding). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1596) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(23) $2,000,000))(19) $3,577,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the DOL2Go program, bringing driver licensing and identicard services to underrepresented and rural communities.(((24)))(20) $464,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs to provide an interagency transfer to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth to continue efforts to make driver training education more accessible for deaf and hard of hearing youth in the state.(((25)))(21) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional actions in accordance with the recently completed evaluation of ways to implement an older and medically at-risk driver program.(((26)))(22) $10,460,000 of the driver education safety improvement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 299, Laws of 2025 (young driver safety). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1878) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(27)))(23) $22,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 229, Laws of 2025 (transportation network companies). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1332) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))(24) The department shall update its administrative rules to detail the requirements for documentation that health care professionals may provide electronically to individuals for inclusion in applications to the department for special parking privileges under RCW 46.19.010, and shall ensure that vehicle licensing offices have been provided with detailed guidance consistent with these updated administrative rules. These efforts must be completed, and a brief report provided to the transportation committees of the legislature summarizing these efforts, by no later than January 1, 2027.(25)(a) $89,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2374), Laws of 2026 (concerning electric-assisted bicycle and electric motorcycle regulation). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2374), Laws of 2026 is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection (25) lapses.(b) As part of the scope of work required under the bill, the work group must also address the regulatory landscape currently in place for micromobility devices, including electric unicycles, scooters, and tricycles, and whether revisions or additions to current regulations could better align the state's approach with the regulation of other vehicles.(26) $148,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2637), Laws of 2026 (PRA/personal information). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2637), Laws of 2026 is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(27) $14,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2323), Laws of 2026 (Traffic stops/blue envelope). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2323), Laws of 2026 is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(28) $751,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation, $125,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, and $376,000 of the license plate technology accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for improvements and necessary changes to the department's information technology systems. In utilizing the funding provided in this subsection, the department must prioritize legislatively directed changes and statutory changes resulting from legislation.(29) $817,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to finalize the upgrade and improvements to its prorate and fuel tax system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.Sec. 209. 2025 c 416 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM BPuget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,701,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($50,261,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,426,000State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,378,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($38,652,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,154,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($26,683,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,336,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($42,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,761,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($167,930,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,756,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation and $12,820,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips; and(b) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.(3) The department shall make detailed annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's website in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 209(5), chapter 186, Laws of 2022.(4) As part of the department's 2027-2029 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.(5) $150,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation, $150,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge accountâstate appropriation, $150,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation, and $150,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the development of a strategic, long-range tolling feasibility assessment that indicates the operational viability and revenue potential for possible future tolled facilities in the state. At a minimum, the department, working in partnership with the transportation commission, shall: Identify candidate projects for modeling analysis utilizing a screening tool that seeks to maximize systemwide performance; determine tolling feasibility and potential gross and net toll revenue for each identified project; consider various approaches to tolling operations and their associated costs; and identify the potential impacts of tolling to surrounding roadways. The strategic tolling feasibility assessment must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2026.(6) As part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, the department must submit recommendations to further reduce mailing and other customer correspondence costs over the long-term, including implementation cost estimates.(7) The legislature intends that tolling commence as soon as possible on the I-405 express toll lanes Renton to Bellevue corridor. The legislature intends to provide additional funding for operations and maintenance expenditures on the corridor if such funding is necessary due to earlier than expected tolling commencement.Sec. 210. 2025 c 416 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGYâPROGRAM CMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,970,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,472,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($127,544,000))Â Â Â Â Â $130,520,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$307,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,059,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,062,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$1,488,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($146,840,000))Â Â Â Â Â $149,819,000Sec. 211. 2025 c 416 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM DâOPERATINGMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($43,820,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,937,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,044,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$34,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($45,898,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,015,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for tenant improvements and other costs associated with administrative space efficiency actions taken throughout the agency. The department must continue to aggressively pursue office and administrative space efficiency as detailed in recent reports identifying opportunities for savings and cost avoidance, including:(a) Reducing costs, such as leases, facility maintenance, and utilities, from agency consolidations;(b) Implementing colocations with other state, local, and other public agencies to reduce costs and improve cost-efficiency while meeting utilization standards; and(c) Evaluating specific additional opportunities for space efficiency, consolidations, and colocation opportunities associated with the Bellingham engineering field office, the Corson Avenue regional headquarters campus, the Dayton Avenue northwest regional headquarters, and the transportation building in Olympia.(2) By January 1st of each year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department must provide a progress report on implementing the actions under subsection (1) of this section in the most recent calendar year and any planned actions in the subsequent two-year period in these efforts.Sec. 212. 2025 c 416 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâAVIATIONâPROGRAM FAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($13,398,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,441,000Aeronautics AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,597,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,154,000Aeronautics AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,055,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,655,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2026, identifying a selection of sustainable aviation projects for funding by the legislature. In considering projects to recommend to fund, the department shall only consider projects that advance the state of sustainable aviation technology and lead to future innovation. Innovative sustainable aviation projects may include, but are not limited to, pilot projects demonstrating the use of:(a) Mobile battery charging technology;(b) Hydrogen electrolyzers and storage;(c) Electric ground equipment; and (d) Hanger charging technology.(2) $500,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Snohomish county to conduct a study to plan for and identify on-site or off-site improvements necessary to implement capacity expansion at Paine Field to meet future regional commercial passenger demand.(3) $300,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Bremerton to conduct the second phase of a feasibility study on the possibility of offering commercial service at the Bremerton National Airport. The department may not require a match for this project.(4) $750,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the city of Yakima for an overflow parking lot at the Yakima Air Terminal. The department may not require a match for this project.(5) $1,774,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commercial aviation work group created in chapter 463, Laws of 2023, specifically for the following activities:(a) The state commercial aviation work group shall comprehensively evaluate the long-range commercial aviation needs of Washington within the broader context of state transportation needs and the specific needs of western Washington taking into consideration airport capacity in adjacent states and provinces. The work group shall review existing data and conduct research to determine Washington's long-range commercial aviation facility needs while considering alternatives to additional airport capacity.(b)(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the work group shall investigate the expansion of existing aviation facilities and possible siting locations for new greenfield aviation facilities, with the expected outcome to be a report that compares the strengths and weaknesses of each site considered. In this investigation, the work group shall consider both new sites and those previously identified in previous aviation planning documents. The work group must consider all impacts that, whether by the expansion of a current facility or the location of a new greenfield site, the creation of a new primary commercial aviation facility may have, including impacts on:(A) Community members and quality of life;(B) The environment, including the impacts of a facility on water quality and the ability of the state to meet the greenhouse gas emissions limits established in RCW 70A.45.020;(C) County master plans and other local planning and zoning, including development regulations and comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW; and(D) Current airspace operations.(ii) The work group shall:(A) Perform outreach to and make efforts to collaborate with:(I) Applicable federal agencies including the federal aviation administration, the United States environmental protection agency, the United States department of defense, and the United States department of energy;(II) Indian tribes, as defined in RCW 43.376.010, through outreach and collaboration by the work group under this subsection does not constitute or substitute for formal government-to-government consultation under the 1989 State-Tribal Relations/Centennial Accord and chapter 43.376 RCW;(III) The environmental community;(IV) Local communities;(V) Economic development agencies;(VI) Other states and provinces as appropriate;(B) Identify potential site infrastructure shortfalls and make recommendations as to how they could be most suitably addressed, including the feasibility of the specific transportation infrastructure required to move people to the potential site. This process includes the delivery of an adequate supply of aircraft fuel and supporting infrastructure along with facilities needed to transition to the use of sustainable aviation fuels;(C) Consider the cost of construction of a facility and supporting infrastructure;(D) In cooperation with the federal aviation administration, analyze:(I) Airspace requirements and airspace restrictions of potential sites;(II) Any possible terrain and man-made obstacles that could possibly create a hazard to aircraft;(III) Local weather patterns and microclimates to determine if they will create issues for the operation of large aircraft; and(E) Carry out other duties as assigned by the legislature.(c) The work group shall not consider:(i) Expansion opportunities for a port or county run airport located in a county with a population of 2,000,000 or more; or(ii) The expansion of an existing airport or the siting of a new airport that would be incompatible with the operations of a military installation.(d) In addition, the work group shall provide information to the transportation committees of the legislature on the future of aviation growth in the state, including potential commercial aviation, general aviation, and air cargo demands, with consideration of new technologies, alternative transportation modes, and the airport of the future.(e) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to endorse, limit, or otherwise alter existing or future plans for capital development and capacity enhancement at existing commercial airports in Washington.(6) $2,100,000 of the aeronautics accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the move ahead WA aviation grants. The department shall prioritize projects eligible for federal funding.Sec. 213. 2025 c 416 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM HMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($70,272,000))Â Â Â Â Â $70,279,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$500,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,176,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$572,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($72,520,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,527,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the city of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the city of Edmonds with the first right of purchase at fair market value in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.(2)(a) $572,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to track and maximize clean fuels credits and revenue generated by state agencies pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW.(b) The LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, anticipates fulfillment of the requirements under chapter 70A.535 RCW of generating credits and revenue for transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including the move ahead WA transportation package. The omnibus transportation appropriations act anticipates credits for ferry electrification for new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, transit programs and projects, alternative fuel infrastructure, connecting communities, and multimodal investments.(c) Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 70A.535.050(5), the department must present a detailed projection of the credit revenues generated and achieved directly as a result of the funding and activities in this subsection.(3) $350,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the department to explore alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way consistent with section 214(7), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(4) The department may not execute a state highway route transfer under RCW 36.75.090 and 47.24.010 without approval from the receiving city or county from July 1, 2025, until June 30, 2026. The department may continue discussions with local jurisdictions regarding state highway route transfers to local jurisdictions that may occur after consideration of the final report and recommendations of the Washington State Route Jurisdiction Study expected by December 2025.(5) The legislature must be consulted before any decisions on parcel numbers 7666206955 and 7666206950 for more than temporary use and before entering into any negotiations, or signing any contracts or lease for development, lease, or sale of those properties.(6) $250,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2025 (lease of unused highway land). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1774) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))(7) $285,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 365, Laws of 2025 (streamlining of permitting for transportation projects work group). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1902) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))(8) During the 2025â2027 fiscal biennium, if the department completes the final design for the North Spokane Corridor Project - I-90 Connection Phase, and the department confirms that the property is not presently needed for highway purposes and that the use would not conflict with adjacent highway purposes, the department shall provide the Carl Maxey Center the opportunity to lease WSDOT property along I-90 in the East Central Neighborhood for the purposes of affordable housing using lease terms consistent with RCW 47.12.120.Sec. 214. 2025 c 416 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPSâPROGRAM KMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,647,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$200,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($51,526,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,733,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($167,962,000))Â Â Â Â Â $169,567,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($221,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $255,147,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($25,000,000))$27,005,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program described in RCW 47.04.350. Of this amount, $2,005,000 represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(2) $125,851,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a point-of-sale voucher incentive program, inclusive of costs for program administration and staffing, to encourage the faster adoption of zero-emission medium and heavy-duty vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and state equity goals under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The voucher incentive program must be administered by a third-party administrator that has experience administering voucher incentive programs, with oversight conducted by the department.(a) The voucher program is required to be designed based on the recommendations of the Joint Transportation Committee report Washington State Infrastructure and Incentive Program Design for MHD ZEVs, and to include:(i) Simplified zero-emission vehicle eligibility requirements;(ii) Vehicle and infrastructure incentives aligned with programs in other jurisdictions, where appropriate, to streamline user planning;(iii) Financial enhancements for select populations based on equity considerations, including for vehicles in disadvantaged communities and vehicles to be purchased by small, minority-owned businesses, with consideration for support of the secondary vehicle market;(iv) A centralized user and manufacturer portal for information, application, and assistance;(v) A fleet assistance and qualification program to assist in zero-emission vehicle and infrastructure planning, to be administered by the Washington State University extension energy program in coordination with the department and the voucher program's third-party administrator; and(vi) A voucher preapproval process to evaluate participant eligibility, readiness for fleet deployment, and infrastructure preparedness.(b) The following battery electric and hydrogen fuel cell electric vehicle categories and associated charging, as well as refueling infrastructure for these categories, are eligible for the voucher program, subject to additional qualification criteria to be determined by the department and the voucher program third-party administrator:(i) On-road vehicles from class 2b, heavy work pickups and vans, through class 8, heavy tractor-trailer units and refuse trucks; and(ii) Cargo handling and off-road equipment.(c) School buses and transit vehicles eligible for state grant programs for the purchase of zero-emission vehicles are not eligible for vouchers under this program, but are eligible for fleet assistance provided in association with the voucher program, which must include assistance in determining state and federal grant eligibility for these vehicles.(d) The voucher amounts selected by the department and voucher program third-party administrator must further the policy goals of the program cited in this subsection by offsetting investments required for medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment owners to transition to zero-emission vehicles and equipment. The department and voucher program third-party administrator must condition vehicle and infrastructure voucher funding to ensure these program policy goals are furthered through the voucher funding provided.(e) Consistent with voucher program design, the department is required to distribute funds to the voucher program third-party administrator sufficiently in advance of final requirements for voucher distribution being met to facilitate the voucher's timely distribution by the third-party administrator to sellers of zero-emission vehicles and infrastructure.(3)(((a) $14,986,000))$5,748,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely ((for grants, or to serve as a state match for secured federal funds, to finance hydrogen refueling infrastructure and fueling stations for medium and heavy-duty vehicles and up to two years of hydrogen fueling station operational costs along corridors designated as hydrogen corridors by the state or near or on transit agency, port, or public utility district property, or finance hydrogen fuel cell transportation infrastructure projects. The department, in consultation with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council, should pursue any federal funding available through the charging and fueling infrastructure discretionary grant program and any other sources under the federal infrastructure investment and jobs act (P.L. 29 117-58), and other public or private funding sources as necessary, to bring hydrogen fueling stations into commercial operation.))for the Squaxin Island Tribe for a hydrogen fueling station along a corridor designated as a hydrogen corridor by the state, and up to two years of hydrogen fueling station operational costs.(4) $5,748,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for a hydrogen fueling station along a corridor designated as a hydrogen corridor by the state, and up to two years of hydrogen fueling station operational costs.(5) $790,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for state match funding for the west coast truck charging and fueling corridor project, funded through the federal charging and fueling infrastructure program, which includes the installation of one hydrogen fueling station along I-5.(((b)))(6) $2,500,000 ((of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection))of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely ((to))for Community Transit for a hydrogen fuel cell demonstration project.(((c)))(7) $200,000 ((of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection))of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for hydrogen fuel cell demonstration projects that provide long term power equipment and fuel for traffic signals at critical intersections during emergencies involving power disruptions or shutoffs.(((4) $400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the cities of Bellevue and Redmond to each purchase an electric fire engine.(5)))(8) $1,725,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for a Tacoma Public Utilities medium-duty zero-emission utility service vehicle pilot project that includes charging infrastructure and mobile battery units.(((6)))(9) $890,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 417, Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(7) $8,342,000))(10) $10,080,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the electric vehicle charger reliability and accessibility accelerator program for projects to support the repair or replacement of existing broken or nonoperational publicly accessible chargers. Of this amount, $1,738,000 represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(((8)))(11) $3,164,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for funding for the west coast charging and fueling corridor project for two medium and heavy-duty vehicle electric vehicle charging station sites and one site with a hydrogen refueling station along the I-5 corridor.(((9)))(12) The department shall notify the transportation committees of the legislature if approval of federal funding for department activities under the national electric vehicle infrastructure formula program, the electric vehicle charger reliability and accessibility accelerator program, or the west coast charging and fueling corridor project is permanently revoked.Sec. 215. 2025 c 416 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâHIGHWAY MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM MMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($571,090,000))Â Â Â Â Â $572,120,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$53,675,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,402,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,202,000RV AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,100,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,726,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,585,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,752,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,624,000Preserve Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($655,954,000))Â Â Â Â Â $691,784,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.(2) $25,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for repair and replacement of traffic barriers including, but not limited to, low-speed concrete barriers, beam guardrails, steel-backed timber guardrails, and other systems necessary to fabricate, construct, and install traffic barriers to improve safety on state highway infrastructures.(3) $11,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for lane striping using ((the most reflective paint available to maximize the visibility of lane striping, especially at night))materials that meet or exceed the federal minimum retro reflectivity requirements established in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) to ensure maximizing nighttime and low visibility lane-marking performance.(4)(a) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way and may reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a minimum of $2,000,000 must be used to deliver more frequent removal of litter on the highway rights-of-way that is generated by unsheltered people and may be used to hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. The department may use these funds to either reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are providing enhanced safety to department staff during debris cleanup or during efforts to prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way.(b) Beginning November 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol and the department of transportation must jointly submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts, including:(i) A summary of the activities related to addressing encampments, including information on arrangements with local governments or other entities related to these activities;(ii) A description of the planned activities in the ensuing two quarters to further address the emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way; and(iii) Recommendations for executive branch or legislative action to achieve the desired outcome of reduced emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way.(5) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Spokane, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (4) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $555,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Spokane shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(6) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (2) of this section. The department must maintain a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.(7) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (4) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $570,000 is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.(8) $3,675,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for initial and ongoing implementation costs of the department's Snoqualmie winter operations study recommendations, which include installation of large regulatory signs, installation of a remote avalanche control system, developing chain enforcement processes in coordination with the Washington state patrol, improving cost recovery from violators, and securing an on-call class C towing company.(9) $2,000,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance activities in the vicinity of the state route number 99 deep bore tunnel in preparation for, and during, the 2026 World Cup. Appropriations in this subsection assume additional revenue from a temporary toll rate adjustment on the state route number 99 tunnel leading up to and during the 2026 World Cup.(10)(a) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Fife to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department-owned rights-of-way along the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project corridor in and adjacent to the city limits.(b) The city must coordinate and work with the department and local governments and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way. State funds may be used to reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing that is not on the rights-of-way or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way.(c) The department may hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. (d) Funds may also be used to reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are participating as part of a state or local government agreement to provide enhanced safety related activities along state highway rights-of-way.(e) It is the intent of the legislature that the city and collaborating partners should place particular emphasis on utilizing available funds for addressing large scale and multiple homeless encampments that impact public safety and health. Funding for initiatives associated with such encampments may include targeted assistance to local governments and social service organizations, directing moneys toward not only initial efforts to clear encampments, clean up debris and restore sightlines, but to ongoing work, monitoring, and maintenance of efforts to place individuals in housing, treatment, and services, and to better ensure individuals experiencing homelessness receive needed assistance while sites remain safe and secure for the traveling public.(11) $180,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for graffiti mitigation operations using spray drone technology.(12) $35,000,000 of the preserve Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for supporting essential maintenance activities necessary for timely repairs, adequate equipment and materials, and the reliable operation of Washington's transportation system.Sec. 216. 2025 c 416 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâOPERATINGHighway Safety FundâState Appropriation. . . .$10,621,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($88,980,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,928,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,088,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,087,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$294,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,124,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,000,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$247,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$44,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,122,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$36,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($116,556,000))Â Â Â Â Â $118,503,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified in section 208(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(d) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to private, for hire vehicles regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW that have been specially manufactured, designed, or modified for the transportation of a person who has a mobility disability and uses a wheelchair or other assistive device. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, wheelchair-accessible taxicabs that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered public transportation vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.(e) Nothing in this subsection is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.(2) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $100,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of fees imposed under RCW 46.17.400, 46.44.090, and 46.44.0941 for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2023. The department may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card transactions.(3) $10,621,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras). Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 46.63.200(10), the department, in collaboration with the Washington state patrol and the Washington traffic safety commission, must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2027, on the data and efficacy of speed safety camera system use in state highway work zones. A preliminary report on the pilot activities is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, and must include, but is not limited to: (a) The number of deployments and locations of the speed safety cameras, (b) staffing workload, (c) number of violations issued, (d) detailed expenses incurred by each agency in the pilot, and (e) efficiency measures each agency has taken in operating the pilot program in the most cost-effective manner possible.(4) $1,279,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations of the virtual coordination center. The department is encouraged to apply for federal grant funds for the virtual coordination center and may use state funds as a match. By December 1, 2026, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature: (a) Recommendations to expand the center's operations, including specific additional jurisdictions and corridors across the state; and (b) amounts received and dates of receipt of any new cash and in-kind matches from virtual coordination center partners including, but not limited to, the city of Seattle, King county, other state and local jurisdictions, and private sector partners.(5) $1,900,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the department, in coordination with the independent review team of the joint transportation committee, to conduct an analysis of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail, consistent with section 217(9), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The department shall provide status updates on a quarterly basis in coordination with the joint transportation committee. The department must submit a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(6) $4,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for transportation operations activities to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup. These activities include, but are not limited to, transportation management center operations and upgrades, additional incident response team coverage, trail crossing improvements, and updated guide signage/wayfinding.(7) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists. Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium.(8) The department is encouraged to erect wayfinding signs along northbound and southbound Interstate 5 identifying routes to Paine Field airport.(9) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department must identify low-cost enhancement projects that could substantially fulfill safety improvements before proceeding on full project scope designs and engineering. Low-cost enhancements may include, but are not limited to, new signage, rumble strips, speed bumps, flashing crosswalk lights, lowering speed limits, lane narrowing via traffic calming, and other safety improvements. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.(10) The department shall promote safety messages encouraging drivers to slow down and move over and pay attention when emergency lights are flashing on the side of the road and other suitable safety messages on electronic message boards the department operates across the state. The messages must be promoted through June 30, 2027. The department may coordinate such messaging with any statewide public awareness campaigns being developed by the department of licensing or the Washington state traffic safety commission, or both.(11) $1,050,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington's share of efforts to mitigate collision risk at the Lewis and Clark and Astoria-Megler bridges, including a vessel collision risk assessment, installation of an air gap sensor, and expansion of the virtual coordination center.Sec. 217. 2025 c 416 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM SMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($45,218,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,253,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$780,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,650,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,400,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$510,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,920,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,079,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$220,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$136,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$127,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$114,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($64,575,000))Â Â Â Â Â $71,769,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through:(i) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) and career opportunity maritime preapprenticeship support services (COMPASS) programs, which aim to increase diversity in the highway construction and maritime workforces and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction and maritime workforces. In addition to the services allowed under RCW 47.01.435, the PASS and COMPASS programs may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems to support their participation in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program and support services to obtain necessary maritime documents and coast guard certification; and(ii) Assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry.(b) The department shall report every even-numbered year to the transportation committees of the legislature on efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce.(c) The office of equity and civil rights may revise program standards, as needed, with legislative consultation.(2) $1,512,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and $488,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for monitoring, assistance, engagement, reporting, and other activities consistent with section 218(2), chapter 310, Laws of 2024.(3) $3,650,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup. These activities include, but are not limited to, digital advertising for traveler information, Title VI compliance and language access, and Americans with disabilities act compliance and training.(4) The department's office of equity and civil rights and the office of minority and women's business enterprises must develop two new business-size thresholds within the office's certification program. The two new thresholds must include emerging small businesses and rising small businesses with gross receipts of no more than (a) $3,000,000 and (b) $10,000,000. This work must include evaluation of all state-funded contracts over $50,000,000 for emerging small business goals, rising small business goals, small business goals, or any combination thereof. The office of equity and civil rights and the office of minority and women's business enterprises must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025, on this work and any recommendations on next steps.(5) Within amounts provided in this section, a maximum of $75,000 is for the department's office of equity and civil rights to contract with Western Washington University to analyze the economic benefit of utilizing small businesses on department projects to the Washington state economy.(6) For department small works roster projects under RCW 39.04.151, the department may only allow firms certified as public works small business enterprises, under RCW 39.19.030, to bid on the project contract, unless the department determines there would be insufficient bidders for a particular project. The department shall report on the effectiveness of this policy to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(7) (($6,791,000))$10,950,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $3,075,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to complete the transportation reporting and accounting information system to the current cloud version of the software and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.Sec. 218. 2025 c 416 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCHâPROGRAM TInterstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($32,682,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,867,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($43,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,873,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$400,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,900,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,348,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,489,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$2,816,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($657,000))Â Â Â Â Â $400,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($96,007,000))Â Â Â Â Â $96,693,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,557,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade the department's linear referencing system (LRS) and highway performance monitoring system (HPMS).(2) $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and the entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Interstate 5 planning. The work under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, the following:(a) Continued development of an Interstate 5 master plan;(b) Advancing seismic vulnerability analyses;(c) An interim report on the progress of the Interstate 5 master plan to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2026; and(d) An assessment of Interstate 5 on-ramps in the core area of the interstate system from the Pierce county line in Federal Way to state route number 531/Smokey Point boulevard in Arlington to evaluate installing new meters or revising high occupancy vehicle bypasses at existing meters and prioritize locations for ramp meter installations or high occupancy vehicle bypass conversions.(3) $140,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the city of Seattle's office of planning and community development to continue to support an equitable development initiative to reconnect the South Park neighborhood, currently divided by state route number 99, consistent with section 219(4), chapter 310, Laws of 2024. The city must provide a final report that includes recommendations by June 30, 2027.(4) Consistent with RCW 47.04.280(1)(d), when the department submits the attainment report required under RCW 47.04.285, it shall visually display statewide annual hours of travel delay by displaying data within each major corridor, to the extent practicable.(5) $1,500,000 of the Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for state route number 167 that builds on the SR 167 master plan completed in June 2023. The SR 167 implementation plan must include, but is not limited to, high-level engineering and cost estimating work necessary to update the I-405/SR 167 corridor funding and phasing report that needs to be completed to advance priority project components developed in the SR 167 master plan. The SR 167 implementation plan with recommendations is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(6) $4,620,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for work on the road usage charge research project overseen by the Washington state transportation commission using amounts of the federal grant award.(7) The department shall continue to coordinate planning work focused on the transportation system in western Washington across modes with the goal of maximizing system performance toward the policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 in the most cost-effective manner. This coordination must include, but is not limited to: The Interstate 5 highway corridor, existing rail infrastructure and future high-speed rail alignment, and commercial aviation capacity. The department must report on the status of these planning efforts including, but not limited to, a long-term strategy for addressing resilience of the transportation system in western Washington through consideration of changing demand, modal integration, and preservation needs. The coordinated work must include an analysis of different alternatives to promote system resilience, including performance and cost of each scenario. The report is due to the joint transportation committee by November 1, 2025.(8) $1,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a corridor vision and implementation plan that identifies improvement options to address safety and multimodal mobility needs on the state route number 164 corridor from Dogwood Street East in Auburn to High Point Street in Enumclaw. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature with recommended safety and multimodal infrastructure improvements by June 30, 2027.(9) (($657,000))$400,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington department of mechanical engineering, to further study measures to reduce noise impacts from the state route number 520 bridge expansion joints. ((The field testing shall be scheduled during existing construction, maintenance, or other scheduled closures to minimize impacts. The testing must also ensure safety of the traveling public. The study shall examine the types and durability of the materials used to provide noise mitigation and the costs associated with the differing types of materials. A draft report))To address the safety of the traveling public and mitigate for potential joint damage, the study must include laboratory-based testing of a highly durable sound attenuation system based on the system developed in the WSDOT Modular Bridge Expansion Joints - Phase 2 study. A draft report, including test results and recommendations describing and identifying the duration of future studies, must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by ((March))October 1, 2026. A final report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2026.(10) $200,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a feasibility study to determine the optimal location for an essential public facility at exit 34 off Interstate 90 in North Bend in accordance with RCW 26.70A.200 and 47.06.140. The facility shall include the King County Readiness Center, Interstate 90 and Highway 18 truck parking, and a regional Washington State Patrol office and weigh station in the exit 34 area of the city of North Bend. The department shall conduct the feasibility study with the Washington State Patrol in consultation with King County, the Washington State Military Department, the Snoqualmie Indian Tribe, and the city of North Bend within a time frame that accommodates the relocation and funding schedule of the Washington State Military Department for the King County Readiness Center. The department and the Washington State Patrol must report the findings of the feasibility study to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.(11) Within existing resources, the department shall complete an analysis of bridge strikes in Washington state within the last three years and of best practices of interventions utilized by other jurisdictions. By September 1, 2026, the department shall develop and submit recommendations to reduce the number of bridge strikes. Recommendations should include potential improvements to physical infrastructure; location, type, and height of posted warning signage; information and training campaigns for drivers; and scalable options for costs for each recommendation.Sec. 219. 2025 c 416 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâCHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIESâPROGRAM UAeronautics AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($147,000))Â Â Â Â Â $205,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($103,363,000))Â Â Â Â Â $157,451,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,120,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,683,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($86,000))Â Â Â Â Â $92,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,180,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,649,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,835,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,432,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$51,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($66,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($111,893,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,680,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiations that could result in a settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds $5,000,000, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(2) On August 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.(3) On August 1, 2025, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.(4) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.(5) $1,931,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional costs associated with the planned consolidation of staff at a variety of facilities in Thurston county. As part of the request, the department must submit a comprehensive consolidation plan that does not include new space and that identifies the best use of existing state owned or leased space, developed in conjunction with the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management, that details the planned action steps and timeline to achieve the office and administrative space efficiency as detailed in recent reports identifying opportunities for savings and cost avoidance while prioritizing employee safety. Beginning July 1, 2026, and semiannually thereafter, the department must provide a report on the progress in meeting the outcomes specified in the comprehensive consolidation plan to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.Sec. 220. 2025 c 416 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($275,545,000))Â Â Â Â Â $276,498,000State Vehicle Parking AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$784,000Rural Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$32,223,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($101,683,000))Â Â Â Â Â $105,379,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($4,459,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,457,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($414,794,000))Â Â Â Â Â $419,441,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $62,698,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($78,525,000))$79,077,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation distributed in accordance with RCW 47.66.150. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of special needs transportation grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(b) (($425,000))Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1), $977,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(2) The department shall not require more than a 10 percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.(3) $1,124,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a statewide vanpool benefit for all state employees. For department employees working in remote job sites, such as mountain passes, the department must ensure employees are able to access job sites via a subsidized vanpool or provide a modal alternative for the "last mile" to ensure employees can access the job site without additional charge.(4) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and submit this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2025.(5) $32,223,000 of the rural mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of rural mobility transportation grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(6) $3,300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, $5,700,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of CTR grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(7) (($188,900,000))$189,301,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for transit support grants. The department must confirm zero-fare policies are in effect at transit agencies to be eligible for biennial distributions. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of transit support grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The Legislature finds that a voter-approved phased-in reauthorization of existing sales tax authority that maintains current levels of service hours, does not constitute a delay or suspension of voter-approved taxes under RCW 47.66.140.(8) $3,400,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the pilot program established under RCW 47.04.355 to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate-income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards.(9) $900,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement certain recommendations from the 2023 frequent transit service study. The department shall define levels and types of demand-response service and measure access to these services within Washington for the purpose of gaining a fuller picture of transit access. The department must collect ongoing transportation data and develop systems to allow for analysis of disparities in access to existing fixed route transit. The data collection should prioritize collecting information on accessibility and inclusion of people with disabilities, vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, and other underserved communities. The department shall submit a report on data collection efforts to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2026.(10) $9,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies for enhanced services between June 1, 2026, and July 30, 2026.(a) Enhanced services consist of:(i) Increased frequency on regular routes, creating temporary shuttle services, enhancing on-demand services, increasing frequency of water taxi services, and supporting incentives to encourage transit use; and(ii) Enhancing customer experience by temporarily increasing operations, cleanliness, rider communications, wayfinding, and safety and security.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must distribute:(i) Forty percent to King County metro;(ii) ((Twenty))Forty percent to public transportation benefit areas and regional transit authorities operating in the four counties making up the largest regional transportation planning organization in the state, distributed proportionally based on agency service hours; and(iii) Twenty percent to other public transit agencies operating in cities named by a World Cup organizing committee to host fan zones, excluding agencies already included in (b)(ii) of this subsection, distributed proportionally based on agency service hours.(c) Agencies must submit their planned expenditures to the department and the Washington state transit association for review by December 1, 2025. If any agency does not submit a plan to enhance services consistent with (a) of this subsection, the department must redistribute funding to other transit agencies using the distribution in (b) of this subsection.(11) $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for King county metro as part of a federal funds exchange pilot. Amounts provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until notification has been received by the department's public transportation division from Washington state ferries that the conditions outlined in section 222(13) ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025 have been met. The pilot must be conducted in coordination with the Puget Sound regional council, who has programming authority for the federal funds to be exchanged. By January 15, 2026, King county metro must report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature a summary of projects funded or planned to be funded, and recommendations for continuation of the federal funds exchange pilot through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, including additional amounts eligible to be exchanged.(12) (($350,000))$590,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Pierce county to support public transportation services on the Key Peninsula.(13) $950,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for RiverCities Transit to operate weekday transit service from Longview to Vancouver.(14) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for intercity bus expansion in preparation for the 2026 World Cup. The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management annually on each January 15th with expansion status and performance updates.(15) The legislature intends in the 2027-2029 biennial budget and beyond to fully restore the multimodal transportation account funding for transportation demand management programs to levels that match 2025-2027 biennial appropriations.(16)(a)(i) $3,120,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to implement affordable transit pass pilot programs at local community and technical colleges, as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, that do not currently operate affordable transit pass programs. At a minimum, the pilot programs must make affordable transit passes available to all students enrolled in a degree-seeking or certificate-seeking program or an inclusive postsecondary education program at participating institutions, including free or reduced-fare passes for students who qualify.(ii) King county metro must include Highline Community College as one of the participating institutions.(iii) No more than $120,000 of this amount may be used for administrative and program implementation costs.(b) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Kitsap transit to implement affordable transit pass pilot programs consistent with (a)(i) of this subsection (16).(c) By January 30, 2027, King County metro and Kitsap transit must jointly provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include details on program implementation, student participation levels, fare subsidy structures, and recommendations for continuation or expansion of the pilot programs in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.Sec. 221. 2025 c 416 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâMARINEâPROGRAM XPuget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($643,803,000))Â Â Â Â Â $646,346,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$126,642,000Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$121,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($770,566,000))Â Â Â Â Â $773,109,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2025-2027 supplemental and 2027-2029 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.(2)(a) $74,374,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâfederal appropriation and $45,523,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge.(b) The Washington state ferries must develop a renewable diesel demonstration project for a representative group of diesel vessels. By September 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must submit findings and recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of legislature that includes, but is not limited to, performance results of the demonstration project, recommendations for renewable diesel usage across the fleet, and possible procurement options for renewable diesel.(3) During negotiations of the 2027-2029 collective bargaining agreements, (a) the department must identify provisions that create barriers for, or contribute to creating a disparate impact on, newly hired ferry employees, including those who are women, people of color, veterans, and other employees belonging to communities that have historically been underrepresented in the workforce; (b) and the department must create a forum for direct discussion between the governor, labor leadership, the office of financial management and the Washington state ferries to collaboratively identify and resolve compensation and staffing issues, with the goal of service improvements for ferry riders. By January 1, 2027, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on progress in incorporating the finding and recommendations from the December 2022 joint transportation committee study on the Washington state ferries' workforce.(4) $50,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct an actuarial evaluation to determine the amount of funds needed in reserve to provide an acceptable amount of self-insurance coverage as compared to the commercial insurance option for the ferry system. The evaluation must also include an analysis of the short and long-term costs and benefits of self-insurance. By December 15, 2026, the department shall report evaluation results to the transportation committees of the legislature.(5) Within existing resources, the department must deploy a pilot program for offering customers wifi on vessels and in terminals. By January 1, 2026, the department must report on the viability of the program to the transportation committees of the legislature, including implementation recommendations and cost estimates. The department must prioritize routes or terminals with wifi coverage issues and consider fee-for-service options.(6) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(7) $11,962,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state ferries workforce development activities.(8) $6,950,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for overtime and familiarization expenses incurred by engine, deck, and terminal staff. The department must provide updated staffing cost estimates for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 with its annual budget submittal and updated estimates by January 1, 2026.(9) $2,548,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for security services at Colman Dock.(10) (($600,000))$650,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for traffic control at ferry terminals at Seattle, Fauntleroy, Kingston, Edmonds, Mukilteo, and Bainbridge Island, during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends. If local law enforcement entities are available, the Washington state ferries may contract with local agencies for traffic control services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 is for traffic control at ferry terminals at Bainbridge Island from May 2026 through August 2026.(11) By December 31st of each year, as part of the annual ferries division performance report, the department must report on the status of efforts to increase the staff available for maintaining the customary level of ferry service, including staff for deck, engine, and terminals. The report must include data for a 12-month period up to the most recent data available, by staff group, showing the number of employees at the beginning of the 12-month period, the number of new employees hired, the number of employees separating from service, and the number of employees at the end of the 12-month period. The department report on additional performance measures must include:(a) Numbers of trip cancellations due to crew availability or vessel mechanical issues;(b) Current average monthly level of service compared to the average monthly full-service schedules in effect in 2019; and(c) Retention rates of employees who have completed on the job workforce development programs and overall employee retention rates.(12) $75,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Evans School of Public Policy at the University of Washington to conduct a study and develop recommendations to design a modernized and more inclusive Washington state ferries' customer advisory process. The study must prioritize ease of customer feedback, inclusion of groups that have been historically underrepresented in customer feedback and engagement processes, and capturing input from passengers using the system for varying purposes. The study must also look at customer engagement models developed by other comparable ferry systems, both domestic and international, for best practices. A report with findings and recommendations is due to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2026.(13) $12,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot with King county metro. The pilot must be conducted in coordination with the Puget Sound regional council, who has programming authority for the federal funds to be exchanged. Washington state ferries must work with the Puget Sound regional council to identify eligible projects for the exchanged federal funds and amend the statewide transportation improvement program (STIP). Upon approval of the amended plan and confirmation of distribution of federal funds from the Puget Sound regional council, Washington state ferries must notify the department's public transportation division for release of state funds to King county metro in section 221(11) of this act. By January 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must report to the office of financial management and transportation committees of the legislature recommendations for expanding the exchange in current and future biennia.(14) The department must work to increase its outreach and recruitment of populations underrepresented in maritime careers and continue working to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, with an emphasis on programs that are shown to improve recruitment for positions with the state ferry system.(15) $2,600,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for winter service enhancements in the San Juan Islands. By December 1, 2026, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management impacts of the service increase including, but not limited to, ridership impacts, service reliability, and whether service changes have induced permanent relocation of workforce serving San Juan Island routes.(16) $855,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a workforce development pilot at the Seattle maritime academy for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Amounts provided in this subsection must be utilized for programs that are a benefit to the Washington state ferries or the prospective workforce pipeline of the Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Washington state ferries certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Seattle central community college has been executed.(a) The memorandum of agreement with Seattle central community college must address:(i) Prioritized use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities for Washington state ferries' employees and trainees;(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan with Seattle central community college aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, including maritime skills center students, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(iii) Consultation between the parties on the development of the training program, recruitment plan and operational plan, with an emphasis on increasing enrollment of women and people of color.(b) Washington state ferries must submit the joint training and recruitment plan to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025. The Washington state ferries must submit findings of program effectiveness and recommendations for continuation of the pilot, to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025.(17) $375,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 296, Laws of 2025 (ferry system salaries). ((If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute House Bill No. 1264) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))(18) $19,700,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase deck and engine positions across the system, prioritizing positions that will mitigate crew related cancellations and reduce overtime expenditures. The department must consider data related to staffing cancellations, as well as current and forecasted staffing levels of deck and engine positions, and mitigation for job classes with the highest overtime costs when adding positions. Funds provided in this subsection are eligible to be used for all deck or engine job classes. The department must include an update on the number of positions hired by job class as part of the annual performance report.(19) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a feasibility study on the possibility of a state-controlled dockyard facility.Sec. 222. 2025 c 416 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,000,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($81,085,000))Â Â Â Â Â $81,092,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$46,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($83,131,000))Â Â Â Â Â $85,138,000Sec. 223. 2025 c 416 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâOPERATINGCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($274,000))Â Â Â Â Â $700,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($15,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,135,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,644,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,643,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,780,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,870,000Multiuse Roadway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,800,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($21,662,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,148,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administration, program management, and evaluation of the federal fund exchange pilot program.(2) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the civilian intervention grant program in accordance with program requirements under section 224(7), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(3) For its 2027-2029 biennial agency budget request, the department shall create a distinct subprogram within local programs for all expenditures and activities for the active transportation division.(4) $930,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:(a) Continue contracting with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to identify, inventory, and prioritize county-owned fish passage barriers;(b) Partner with the county road administration board to update the road cost factor unit costs used in the calculation of the allocation factor for the county's portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax;(c) Create specific guidance and training for county public works departments developing community engagement plans to mitigate project and program harms and maximize community benefits by expanding upon the freight mobility strategic investment board's "Toolkit and Best Practices for Integrating Community Considerations in Infrastructure Investments;" and(d) Continue partnering with the board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors and contract with the Washington state transportation center at the University of Washington to identify best practices within public works for the recruitment and retention of employees, including recommendations for improving outreach and recruitment to underrepresented populations, methods to partner with local community colleges and universities, ways to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, strategies to increase training and development opportunities, and recommendations for career advancement programs and better work life balance outcomes.(5) The city of Seattle must provide a report on any findings and recommendations of the digital conflict area awareness management program, for which state funding was provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, and any implementation needs and process mapping for use by other jurisdictions, to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(6) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support of a United States Coast Guard-compliant basic safety program with Crawford nautical training.(7) $309,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to fund one full-time equivalent liaison position within the local program multiagency permit program. The department shall provide a report with an update on activities in the program to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(8) $70,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Puget Sound harbor committee to support the development of the Puget Sound harbor safety plan.(9) $90,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the city of Tacoma for the purchase of research equipment and operating costs to support the communities for a healthy bay in its work to detect derelict sunken vessels and sunken fish and crabbing gear that may impact or impede shipping lanes in order to assist the state in facilitating the continued accessibility of these commercial routes.(10) $701,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the support of Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom county ferries youth zero-fare policies. Of this amount:(a) $263,000 is for Pierce county;(b) $364,000 is for Whatcom county; and(c) $74,000 is for Skagit county.(11) $986,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state share of the operating deficit of the Wahkiakum county ferry.(End of part)TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâCAPITALSec. 301. 2025 c 416 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,333,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,333,000Rural Arterial Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$51,573,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,456,000County Arterial Preservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$30,242,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($93,251,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,604,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide $21,028,000 for a new county local road grant program for the preservation and improvement of county local roads that are not currently eligible under existing funding programs starting in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(2) $1,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to reimburse counties for design costs associated with preparing projects for construction pursuant to subsection (1) of this section under the new county local road grant program (chapter 417, Laws of 2025; Chapter 36.170 RCW).Sec. 302. 2025 c 416 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITIESâPROGRAM Dâ(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)âCAPITALMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($20,158,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,450,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($21,487,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,900,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,645,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,350,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $9,487,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve its ability to keep facility assets in a state of good repair. In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department, with periodic reporting to the joint transportation committee, must continue to develop and implement a prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects. The legislature intends these to be reasonable, forward-thinking investments that consider potential future space efficiency measures and consolidations, including those assessed as having high commercial value and potential returns to state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property. Prioritization must be based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: (i) Employee safety and facility security; (ii) state and federal regulatory and statutory requirements and compliance issues, including clean buildings requirements; (iii) quality of work issues; (iv) facility condition assessment evaluations and scoring; (v) asset preservation; and (vi) amount of operational support provided by the facility to the achievement of the department's performance measures and outcomes, including facility utilization based on field operations work supported at the location. "Field operations" includes maintenance, transportation operations, materials testing, and construction.(b) In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department must utilize the prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects used in developing the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium agency budget submittal.(c) By September 1, 2025, and September 1, 2026, the department must provide a report based on the prioritization of facility preservation needs and repair projects developed pursuant to (a) of this subsection to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A by-facility ranking based on the criteria implemented; (ii) detailed information on the actions taken in the previous year to address the identified issues and deficiencies; and (iii) the plan, by facility, to address issues and deficiencies for the remainder of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(2) Within existing resources, in consultation with the office of financial management, the department must continue to use the criteria developed for the preservation and improvement minor works list during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(3) Within existing resources, in consultation with the office of financial management, the department must continue to use criteria for providing building-related capital requests in a comparable format, adjusted where appropriate, to provisions already in use in the omnibus capital appropriations act for building projects, including the C-100 capital request form and other detail requirements for omnibus capital appropriations act building submissions.(4) (($3,000,000))$3,050,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct master planning on highest and best use of the Corson Avenue regional headquarters property, including options to reduce space and footprint on the property, examining the commercial value of the property if converted to other use or sale of a portion of the property, and reviewing alternative financing methods to fund improvements.(5) $625,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to build new parking at an existing agency owned property for approximately 20 large, oversized vehicles displaced from the relocation by June 30, 2026, out of the Edna Lucille Goodrich Building. The funds appropriated in this subsection may not be used for paving.Sec. 303. 2025 c 416 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâIMPROVEMENTSâPROGRAM IAlaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($7,406,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,808,000Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($13,331,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,632,000Move Ahead WA AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$367,916,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($88,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,200,000State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$20,000,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$545,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($8,948,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,443,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($271,567,000))Â Â Â Â Â $309,701,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($487,331,000))Â Â Â Â Â $649,728,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($54,334,000))Â Â Â Â Â $57,011,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($53,581,000))Â Â Â Â Â $93,843,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,710,931,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,739,917,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($114,708,000))Â Â Â Â Â $129,111,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,557,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,152,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($1,842,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,600,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,100,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($547,950,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,850,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,161,189,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,164,697,000Move Ahead WA AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($467,532,000))Â Â Â Â Â $427,732,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .(($10,563,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,609,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,375,986,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,608,595,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-1))2026-1 as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(3) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(4) The connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($1,422,447,000))$1,159,447,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(5) The special category C accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($101,986,000))$104,572,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.(6) The Puget Sound gateway facility accountâstate appropriation includes up to $88,200,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.(7) The motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation includes up to $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.(8) The Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 express toll lanes accountâstate appropriation includes up to $375,311,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.(9) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($879,000,000))$780,149,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(10) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($164,000,000))$222,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(11) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to (($212,000,000))$186,784,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.(12) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.(13) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.(14)(a) (($54,334,000))$57,011,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation, (($118,178,000))$118,424,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, (($796,352,000))$795,004,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, (($112,263,000))$99,394,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, (($2,698,000))$4,622,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation, and (($8,621,000))$8,730,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.(b) Appropriations within this subsection may be used to jointly leverage state and local funds for match requirements in applying for competitive federal aid grants provided in the infrastructure investment and jobs act for removals of fish passage barriers under the national culvert removal, replacement, and restoration program. State funds used for the purpose described in this subsection must not compromise full compliance with the court injunction by 2030.(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach by replacing both state and local culverts guided by the principle of providing the greatest fish habitat gain at the earliest time. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert conditions, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2025, and June 1, 2026.(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.(e) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall semi-annually provide reports of the amounts of federal funding received for this project to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature.(15)(a) $368,461,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, $127,504,000 of the move ahead WA accountâprivate/local appropriation, and $84,223,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the I-5 Columbia river bridge project (L4000054). The legislature finds that the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge is a project of national significance and is critical for the movement of freight. One span is now more than a century old, at risk for collapse in the event of a major earthquake, and no longer satisfies the needs of commerce and travel. Replacing the aging interstate bridge with a modern, seismically resilient, multimodal structure that provides improved mobility for people, goods, and services is a high priority. Therefore, the legislature intends to support the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge with an investment of $1,000,000,000.(b) The department shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon on any bistate agreements regarding sharing of revenues, use of revenues, and fiscal responsibilities of each state. Prior to finalizing any such agreement, the department shall provide a draft of the agreement to the transportation committees of the legislature for review and input. Additionally, the department shall continue to advise quarterly on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee until any agreements are finalized.(16)(a) (($37,322,000))$43,803,000 of the ((move ahead WA))connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:(i) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of state route number 3 and state route number 302; and(ii) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools.(b) With respect to right-of-way acquisition and the construction of the SR 3 Freight Corridor project (T30400R), tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, on all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe shall continue throughout the duration of any funding or program decisions and proposed project approval.(17) (($8,500,000))$8,105,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation and (($5,000,000))$4,928,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 3/Gorst Area - Widening project (L4000017).(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $7,500,000 is for low-cost enhancements that complement the long-term improvement alternatives identified through planning work on the corridor.(b) Tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe must continue throughout the duration of any funding program and proposed project approval.(18) $23,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâprivate/local appropriation, and (($6,387,000))$13,960,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements project (T20900R). The legislature recognizes the importance of this project and intends to provide additional matching funds if additional competitive federal funding is awarded for the final remaining four-lane section between Wallula and Nine Mile Hill and the Port of Walla Walla provides right-of-way at no cost to the state for this project. The department, in consultation with local governments in the vicinity, must pursue any federal funding available.(19) (($12,571,000))$14,663,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $7,908,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, and $2,429,000 of the special category C accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River - Phase I project (L1000199). The legislature recognizes the importance of this project and the cost uncertainties associated with this project, and is committed to its completion. The legislature intends to monitor the project's budget and schedule and make adjustments as appropriate.(20) (($136,984,000))$144,841,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, (($1,527,000))$1,717,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation, (($28,103,000))$33,230,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation, (($324,483,000))$276,847,000 of the move ahead WA accountâfederal appropriation, (($110,723,000))$147,829,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, (($88,200,000))$50,200,000 of the Puget Sound gateway facility accountâstate appropriation, and (($212,157,000))$326,330,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall continue to collaborate with the affected stakeholders as it implements the corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.(c) The entire multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is for:(i) The design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the state route number 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park; and(ii) Segment 2 of the state route number 167 completion project shared-use path to provide connections to the interchange of state route number 167 at 54th to the intersection of state route number 509 and Taylor Way in Tacoma.(21) (($15,988,000))$25,978,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $2,212,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 224/Red Mountain Vicinity Improvement project (L1000291). The department shall provide funding to the city of West Richland to complete the project within the project scope identified by the legislature, which shall be amended by the department to include the complete streets widening of Keene Road from SR 224 to Belmont Blvd and within the total amount provided by the legislature. The department shall not amend the project's scope of work to add pavement preservation on state route number 224 from the West Richland city limits to Antinori Road.(22) (($100,000,000))$68,000,000 of the special category C accountâstate appropriation, (($272,820,000))$209,788,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, and (($71,000))$164,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is for an environmental justice assessment to determine if traffic noise abatement will reduce environmental harm to the East Central Neighborhood as a result of this project.(23) (($578,139,000))$607,789,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, $20,000,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalty accountâstate appropriation, $1,100,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation, and (($7,278,000))$11,951,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R) and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project, the department shall sell or transfer that portion of the property not necessary for transportation purposes, and shall initiate a process to convey or transfer such portion of the surplus property to a subsequent owner.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,100,000 of the state route number 520 corridor accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for noise mitigation activities.(24) (($10,416,000))$11,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation, $5,229,000 of the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, and (($1,548,000))$6,796,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI), specifically for design of, preliminary engineering, and right-of-way acquisition for the interchange and widening as a single project. The department must consider reserving portions of state route number 522, including designated lanes or ramps, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, motorcycles, private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers, or private transportation provider vehicles pursuant to RCW 47.52.025.(25) (($24,000))$9,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and (($304,000))$5,469,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 900 Safety Improvements project (L2021118). The department must: (a) Work in collaboration with King county and the Skyway coalition to align community assets, transportation infrastructure needs, and initial design for safety improvements along state route number 900; and (b) work with the Skyway coalition to lead community planning engagement and active transportation activities.(26) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $16,625,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended to not continue into future biennia.(27) (($5,030,000))$3,601,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($1,842,000))$3,600,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a technology-based truck parking availability system along the Interstate 5 corridor in partnership with Oregon state and California state to maximize utilization of existing truck parking capacity and deliver real-time parking availability information to truck drivers (L1000375). The department may use a portion of the appropriation in this subsection for grant proposal development and as state match funding for technology-based truck parking availability system federal grant applications. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2026.(28) $57,593,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the payment of deferred sales and use taxes on activities related to the state route number 16 corridor improvements project pursuant to RCW 47.46.060. It is the intent of the legislature that any nontoll accounts used to pay the deferred sales and use taxes will be reimbursed by toll revenues no later than December 31, 2032, which reflects prior legislative intent regarding the use of toll revenues for this purpose.(29) $159,480,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the payment of deferred sales and use taxes on the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project (8BI1009) pursuant to RCW 47.01.412. It is the intent of the legislature that any nontoll accounts used to pay the deferred sales and use taxes will be reimbursed by toll revenues no later than December 31, 2050, which reflects prior legislative intent regarding the use of toll revenues for this purpose.(30) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for the department to apply to the federal highway administration's wildlife crossings pilot program for wildlife crossing underpasses on U.S. 97 between Tonasket and Riverside (L1000373).(31) The legislature intends to evaluate the state's approach to estimating capital project costs and risks, and to explore pooling risk. The department must present to the joint transportation committee on its cost estimating policies and considerations for creating a project risk pool before the 2026 legislative session.Sec. 304. 2025 c 416 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPRESERVATIONâPROGRAM PMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($154,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $156,644,000Recreational Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($751,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,058,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($62,975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,915,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($600,864,000))Â Â Â Â Â $665,864,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$7,935,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($41,159,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,679,000State Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,924,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,055,000Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,871,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,796,000Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,376,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,490,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,648,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,303,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($10,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,886,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$19,780,000Preserve Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$300,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($903,386,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,308,405,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.(2) Within the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation and motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.(3) (($6,000,000))$9,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund (L2000290). The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted.(4) Within the connecting Washington accountâstate appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.(5) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.(6) The appropriations in this section include funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.(7) $17,500,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $16,625,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended to not continue into future biennia.(8) The appropriations in this section include funding for the following projects:(a) SR 525 Bridge Replacement - Mukilteo;(b) SR 4/Abernathy Creek Br - Replace Bridge;(c) SR 155/Omak Bridge Rehabilitation;(d) SR 243 Pavement Preservation and Shoulder Rebuild; and(e) SR 104/Port Angeles Graving Dock Settlement and Remediation.(9) As part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, the department must provide a map of preservation projects that it expects to fund over the following six fiscal years based on the funding levels shown in this act and based on the funding levels requested in its 2026 supplemental budget submittal.(10) The department may not proceed with construction of the US 195/Colfax North Fork Palouse River - Replace Bridges project during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The legislature intends for the project to be delayed until the 2029-2031 fiscal biennium.(11) $12,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the SR 165 Fairfax bridge replacement project (L1000394) so the department may proceed with the project in an expedited manner. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding for planning, design, and environmental review of the project. By January 1, 2027, the department shall provide to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature, cost estimates and projected timelines of replacing the SR 165 Fairfax bridge for consideration in the 2027 legislative session.(12) By January 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature to include a list of the department's top priority bridge preservation and bridge replacement projects for a six-year investment program with the expected project costs and proposed timeline needed for each project. It is the intent of the legislature that this report shall be made annually.(13) $300,000,000 of the preserve Washington accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for supporting essential preservation activities necessary for timely highway and bridge repairs, replacements, and paving, and the reliable preservation of Washington's transportation system. It is the intent of the legislature to continue to invest in Washington state highways by providing an additional $430,000,000 in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for highway preservation.Sec. 305. 2025 c 416 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QâCAPITALMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,845,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,465,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($8,374,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,537,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($635,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,135,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,854,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,137,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($5,621,000))$7,167,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation, (($6,500,000))$10,738,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, and (($635,000))$1,135,000 of the motor vehicle accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for Programmatic Investment for Traffic Operations Capital projects (000005Q). By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all traffic operations capital project investments completed in the prior fiscal biennium.Sec. 306. 2025 c 416 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($183,467,000))Â Â Â Â Â $217,850,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($19,511,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,891,000Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($135,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $133,445,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($338,207,000))Â Â Â Â Â $373,186,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Public Transportation Program (V), except that $10,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is for the Central Campus - Electrification (King County Metro) project (L1000407) instead of the South Annex Base - Electrification Elements (King County Metro) project (L4000174).(2)(a) (($135,229,000))$140,545,000 of the regional mobility grant program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for regional mobility grant projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($58,447,000))$62,865,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this section. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2025, and December 15, 2026, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. A grantee may not receive more than 25 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection unless all other funding is awarded. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, no more than 30 percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee unless all other funding is awarded.(b) To be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities.(c) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Private transportation provider" means an auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and(ii) "Private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.(d) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider applications submitted by regional transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning organizations for the regional mobility grant program funding in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(e) If savings are realized from the underspending or cancellation of projects appropriated in this section, the department may advance any project or projects listed in the "2025-2027 Regional Mobility Grant Program Prioritized Project" list. The funding of any project or projects chosen to be advanced is subject to approval by the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.(3) (($11,636,000))$14,753,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for move ahead WA tribal transit grant projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($1,635,000))$1,953,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. $100,000 of the amount provided in this subsection may be used for program administration and staffing. Grants to federally recognized tribes may be for any transit purpose, including planning, operating costs, maintenance, and capital costs. By December 15, 2026, the department must submit a prioritized list to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature of new projects totaling no more than $5,762,000.(4) $6,291,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional bus and bus facility projects. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,891,000 is for Twin Transit for zero-emission vehicle acquisition (BU232505) and $4,400,000 is for C-TRAN for Highway 99 BRT hydrogen fuel cell buses (BU232507).(5) (($11,800,000))$16,800,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the following projects:(a) Base Refurbish & Expansion for Growth/Columbia County Public Transportation (L4000182);(b) Kitsap Transit: Design & Shore Power (G2000115);(c) Pierce Transit - Meridian (L2021197); and(d) ((King County Metro South Annex Base - Electrification Elements (L4000174)))Central Campus - Electrification (King County Metro) (L1000407).(6) (($6,673,000))$5,325,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a public transit ride share grant program. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of public transit ride share grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($1,673,000))$325,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for a public transit ride share grant program in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(7) (($11,189,000))$13,639,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects. ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,407,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.)) Entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP document referenced in this section receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP document referenced in this section before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.(8) (($1,649,000))$2,927,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($50,799,000))$51,747,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the entire multimodal transportation accountâstate amount and (($18,536,000))$19,484,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate amount are for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction accountâstate funds appropriated in this subsection, $938,000 may be used for program administration and staffing. For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of green transportation capital grants provided pursuant to this subsection, public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(9) For grant awards not yet under contract, as a condition of bus and bus facility grants identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Public Transportation Program (V), public transportation agencies may not delay, divert, supplant, or suspend the collection of approved local sales and use taxes for the purpose of public transportation during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.Sec. 307. 2025 c 416 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâWASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM WCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($229,747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $229,471,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($109,408,000))Â Â Â Â Â $148,752,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($385,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $456,724,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($31,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,817,000Puget Sound Capital Construction AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,679,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,778,000Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,395,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,864,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,424,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,834,000Capital Vessel Replacement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($122,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $120,389,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($893,712,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,029,629,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).(2) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.(3) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports on ferry capital projects: (a) On a semiannual basis, the report must include a status update on projects with funding provided in this section including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Anticipated cost increases and cost savings;(ii) Anticipated cash flow and schedule changes; and(iii) Explanations for the changes.(b) On an annual basis, the report must include a status update on vessel and terminal preservation and improvement plans including, but not limited to, the following: (i) What work has been done; (ii) how have schedules shifted; and (iii) associated changes in funding among projects, accompanied by explanations for the changes.(c) On an annual basis, the report must include an update on the implementation of the maintenance management system with recommendations for using the system to improve the efficiency of project reporting under this subsection.(4) The legislature intends to reassess funding for Bainbridge Island and Kingston terminal electrification projects based on progression of the electrification program and future recommendations of the department.(5) The appropriations in this section include savings assumed under section 719 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025. By October 15, 2026, Washington state ferries must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management any estimated savings, efficiencies realized, and recommendations for further improvements.(6) $6,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for modernization of the ticketing and reservation system (990052C). The department must prioritize integration of ORCA payment, Good to Go! payment, and mobile payment platforms into the new system at the earliest possible phase.(7) The legislature intends to consider alternative forms of financing including, but not limited to, certificates of participation (lease-purchase) and leasing for the purpose of securing up to five hybrid electric vessels for the Washington state ferry system.(8) $12,419,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation and $1,071,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely to close out the program for conversion of vessels to electric hybrid propulsion (L1000339). This represents the final amount to be provided for this purpose.Sec. 308. 2025 c 416 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($91,132,000))Â Â Â Â Â $105,919,000Essential Rail Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,518,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,695,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($316,000))Â Â Â Â Â $365,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$326,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($18,731,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,985,000Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,223,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,525,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($79,468,000))Â Â Â Â Â $100,930,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($113,163,000))Â Â Â Â Â $129,088,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($311,877,000))Â Â Â Â Â $383,833,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Rail Program (Y).(2) $1,500,000 of the transportation infrastructure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(3) $6,899,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) $7,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation and (($25,076,000))$29,648,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the department's continued work on a service development plan for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor under the federal corridor identification and development program (L2021074). The department may not move forward with programmatic environmental review unless authorized to do so by the legislature. Of this amount, $4,572,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(b) The department must coordinate with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature to provide periodic updates and check-in points on progress made over the course of the biennium, with updates available no less frequently than semiannually, and must include written status updates to be provided with sufficient time for review prior to any update meetings held. An annual report on ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor identification and development program efforts must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2025 and December 1, 2026.(5) $3,600,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $8,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the Cascades corridor delivery program for advancing the Cascades corridor (R00003A), including through planning and project development activities conducted as part of the federal corridor identification and development program. The department must continue to pursue funding opportunities for the Cascades corridor through the corridor identification and development program and the federal-state partnership programs at the federal rail administration. The department must notify the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature of funding opportunities from the programs and any corresponding state match needs.(6) (($18,731,000))$36,985,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation, (($54,785,000))$55,639,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation, and $326,000 of the motor vehicle accountâlocal appropriation are provided solely for rehabilitation of the Palouse River and Coulee City Railroad (L4000079). Of this amount, $18,254,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and $854,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâfederal appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(7) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund the replacement of two Tacoma rail diesel-electric switcher locomotives with zero emission battery-electric switcher locomotives and to install on-site charging equipment at a Tacoma rail facility (L1000327). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.(8) (($26,200,000))$26,293,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification competitive grants (L2021182). All public ports are eligible to receive funds under this subsection. A port seeking to use funds under this subsection to install shore power must adopt a policy that requires vessels that dock at the port facility to use shore power if such vessel is capable of using such power and when such power is available at the port facility. Of this amount, $93,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(9) (($1,000,000))$1,995,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Bremerton (L1000337), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology. Of this amount, $995,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(10) (($1,855,000))$1,831,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Anacortes (L1000338), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.(11) (($24,800,000))$25,300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission shore power infrastructure demonstration project at Northwest seaport alliance facilities (L1000325). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured. Of this amount, $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(12) (($5,277,000))$6,300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission drayage truck demonstration project (L1000324) at Northwest seaport alliance facilities. Of this amount, $1,023,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation represents the reappropriation of amounts provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for this purpose.(13) $1,200,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the fruit valley triple track extension project (L1000386) for a track extension from milepost 131.5 to 133.5 to reduce freight congestion at the north end of the Vancouver Yard.(14) $3,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Longview junction to Kalama third mainline track project (L1000387) to connect two existing third mainline tracks to create a 12.5-mile third mainline track.(15) $8,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the interstate yard storage tracks project (L1000388) to add two 8,200 feet freight train storage tracks south of the port of Kalama.(16)(a) $7,500,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for property acquisition and infrastructure costs associated with Washington sponsor ports' obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan.(b) It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate a total of $15,000,000 for this project in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, with $7,500,000 of this amount funded in the 2026 supplemental capital budget.(c) The legislature further intends that the sponsor ports develop a comprehensive financial plan that relies primarily on nonstate funding to support their obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan, and that development of the plan include consideration of economic and ecological uses for dredged material and sites, with input from relevant state agencies.(d) The appropriations made by the legislature in this biennium do not obligate the legislature to provide future funding from the state for expenditures associated with the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan in future biennia.Sec. 309. 2025 c 416 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZâCAPITALCarbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($281,202,000))Â Â Â Â Â $363,137,000Freight Mobility Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($19,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,514,000Freight Mobility Multimodal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($24,952,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,676,000Highway Infrastructure AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($170,384,000))Â Â Â Â Â $104,903,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($37,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,065,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($31,840,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,899,000Motor Vehicle AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($106,461,000))Â Â Â Â Â $145,553,000Motor Vehicle AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($99,002,000))Â Â Â Â Â $93,143,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($115,518,000))Â Â Â Â Â $92,260,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($962,694,000))Â Â Â Â Â $972,650,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature notes that in recent fiscal biennia there has been considerable underspending of local programs appropriations, as the timing of delivery of projects and grant activities by local partners has lagged expectations. The legislature seeks to better align the timing of resource availability with the biennium of expected expenditures, while at the same time providing budget stability and avoiding potential budget reductions. It is therefore the intent of the legislature that, while the amount provided in this biennium's current budget for local projects is less than the total of the 2025-2027 itemized project costs, specified in LEAP Transportation Document 2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 23, 2026, the funding levels in the LEAP document over time represent the appropriations to the agencies, programs, and activities necessary to deliver the projects and activities identified therein.(((1)))(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).(((2)))(3) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:(a) (($38,380,000))$51,227,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation and (($43,372,000))$63,885,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (L2000188 and L1000335). Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 of multimodal transportation accountâstate is for the city of Granger for a pedestrian and bicyclist access project.(b) (($16,933,000))$28,865,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation, (($53,139,000))$70,004,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation, and (($13,321,000))$18,548,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for safe routes to school projects (L2000189 and L1000334). Of the amount of carbon emissions reduction account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.(c) For future rounds of grant selection, the department must reevaluate the criteria to increase geographic diversity of jurisdictions consistent with the requirements of the healthy environment for all (HEAL) act.(((3) $35,528,000))(4) $43,473,000 of the motor vehicle accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will select projects as part of its update of the state freight plan, in consultation with the freight mobility strategic investment board and other stakeholders.(((4)))(5) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, and December 1, 2026, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program and the Sandy Williams connecting communities grant program.(((5) $27,200,000))(6) $28,455,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program (L1000309). The department may partner with a statewide nonprofit to deliver programs. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program support.(((6)))(7) $22,000,000 of the motor vehicle accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program will allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until: Surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in section 305 or 306 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025, is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding, and state funds appropriated in section 305 or 306 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025, for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding have been placed in unallotted status. A report on the effectiveness of the exchange program, the total estimated cost of program administration, and recommendations for continuing the pilot program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026. The department may issue additional calls for projects with any remaining funds provided in this subsection. The legislature intends to evaluate utilization and efficacy of this program, and if underutilized, the program is intended not to continue into future biennia.(((7) $33,200,000))(8) $46,415,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Sandy Williams connecting communities pilot program (L1000308) to deliver projects to reconnect communities that have been bifurcated by state highways. Priority must be given to historically marginalized or overburdened communities. The department may consult with the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council to identify geographic locations where there are high incidences of serious injuries and fatalities of active transportation users among vulnerable populations. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program support.(((8) $500,000))(9) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to award grants to local jurisdictions to implement network-wide traffic conflict screening programs using video analytics in controlled intersections with a disproportionate number of traffic violations and injuries to active transportation users (L2021149). Grants must be awarded proportionally across the state and include controlled intersections in both urban and rural environments and along state highways and county roads. Grant recipients must report back to the department all traffic violation and active transportation facility data acquired during the grant period and provide the department with appropriate next steps for the state and the local jurisdiction to improve traffic safety for active transportation users in such intersections. The department must report such findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(((9)))(10)(a) $7,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue providing rebates to qualifying persons who purchase e-bikes and qualifying equipment and services from a qualifying retailer in accordance with rebate program qualification, application, retailer, and reimbursement requirements under section 310(16)(a), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Of this amount, $4,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(i) of this subsection and $3,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(ii) of this subsection.(i) For persons who are at least 16 years of age and reside in households with incomes at or below 80 percent of the county area median income, the amount of the rebate is up to $1,200 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(ii) For all other persons who are at least 16 years of age, the amount of the rebate is up to $300 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.(b) $3,568,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue its e-bike lending library and ownership grant program in accordance with program requirements under section 310(16)(b), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(c) The department may not collect more than five percent of appropriated amounts to administer the programs under (a) and (b) of this subsection.(((10) $19,335,000))(11) $23,514,000 of the freight mobility investment accountâstate appropriation and (($24,952,000))$25,676,000 of the freight mobility multimodal accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for freight mobility strategic investment board projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section. If funds are made available due to capital project savings or cancellations, additional funds may be provided to the freight mobility projects listed in the LEAP transportation document due to unanticipated project cost increases with board approval.(((11) $170,000))(12) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle office of planning and community development to finish updating the 2020 I-5 Lid Feasibility Study (L2021140).(((12)))(13) The legislature intends to fund the Ballard and Magnolia Bridge project (L4000123), as described in section 911(18), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.(((13) $5,100,000))(14) $5,540,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for development of an applied sustainable aviation evaluation center (L2021135). Snohomish county, in partnership with Washington State University, shall plan and establish facilities to evaluate, qualify or certify, and research technologies that can minimize the impact of aviation on human health and the environment. Funds may be used for, but are not limited to, planning, construction, and land acquisition for sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) qualification testing (ASTM D4054), research on the impact of SAF on the environment and human health, and SAF storage for the purpose of advancing sustainable aviation. At a minimum, three sustainable aviation platforms must be considered:(a) Sustainable aviation fuel;(b) Hydrogen; and(c) Battery electric energy storage mechanisms.(((14) $5,000,000))(15) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist local jurisdictions in addressing emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists (LXXXPBF). Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium. Reporting may be done in conjunction with the transportation operations division.(((15) $45,000,000))(16) $46,491,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Confluence Parkway Infra Match project (L2021180). The legislature intends that in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, $35,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate account funds will be provided for the project only if federal project funding for Phase 2 of the Confluence Parkway project is secured.(((16) $40,000,000))(17) $42,306,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Columbia River Bridge Replacement/Hood River to White Salmon (L4000046). The legislature intends that in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and future biennia, $30,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate account funds will be provided for the project only if federal project funding and a match from the state of Oregon are secured for construction.(18) $6,511,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Reducing Rural Roadway Departures program (L2021122). The department shall structure the program so that grant applications and awards occur concurrently for towns, small cities, counties, and transportation benefit districts and independently of any other grant program administered by the department. The department shall expend all the funds appropriated in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the Reducing Rural Roadway Departures program (L2021122) in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(19)(a) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the ECP EV food distribution fleet upgrade project (L1000405) for a one-time investment to replace aging diesel and gas-powered food distribution vehicles with electric delivery trucks and to install the corresponding electric vehicle charging infrastructure needed to support fleet operations. The legislature intends for the property acquired with these funds to be used solely to serve the public purpose of food distribution to low-income households living in food-desert and overburdened communities.(b) The department must require any property acquired with these funds to be used solely for the purpose specified in (a) of this subsection (19) and, if sold, that proceeds from the sale of the property be used solely for this purpose.(c) The department must also require that, if property acquired with these funds is retained and no longer used solely for the purpose specified in (a) of this subsection (19), the state must be reimbursed for the property at no less than the fair market value of the property at the time the property stops being used for this purpose.(End of part)TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONSSec. 401. 2025 c 416 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax statutory distributions tocities and counties. . . .(($443,860,000))Â Â Â Â Â $458,371,000Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For distribution to cities andcounties. . . .$26,786,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: Fordistribution to cities and counties. . . .$23,438,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($494,084,000))Â Â Â Â Â $508,595,000Sec. 402. 2025 c 416 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and statutorytransfers. . . .(($1,877,014,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,797,289,000Sec. 403. 2025 c 416 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGâTRANSFERSMotor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation: For motorvehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers. . . .(($206,302,000))Â Â Â Â Â $225,368,000Sec. 404. 2025 c 416 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUETransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,061,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,532,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($15,234,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,168,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($510,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($350,000))Â Â Â Â Â $441,000Highway Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,604,659,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,568,496,000Transportation Improvement Board Bond RetirementAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,619,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,793,000Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($28,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,780,000Toll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($90,015,000))Â Â Â Â Â $104,839,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$934,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,877,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,875,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,751,621,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,723,531,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The toll facility bond retirement accountâstate appropriation includes up to $5,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.896.(2) $3,174,000 of the transportation improvement board bond retirement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the prepayment of certain outstanding bonds and debt service.Sec. 405. 2025 c 416 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUEToll Facility Bond Retirement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($39,742,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,527,000Sec. 406. 2025 c 416 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGESTransportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($812,000))Â Â Â Â Â $724,000Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$30,000Transportation Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$20,000Connecting Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,046,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,268,000Special Category C AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($230,000))Â Â Â Â Â $105,000Puget Sound Gateway Facility AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($450,000))Â Â Â Â Â $89,000Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation. . . .$187,000Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 ExpressToll Lanes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$375,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,130,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,798,000Sec. 407. 2025 c 416 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS(1)(a) Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .(($879,000,000))$780,149,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as transportation partnership projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.873. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.(2) Transportation PartnershipAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theTacoma Narrows Toll Bridge AccountâState. . . .$4,436,000(3) Transportation Partnership AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$12,000,000(((3)))(4)(a) Connecting Washington AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .(($164,000,000))$222,000,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.889. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.(((4)))(5)(a) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation: For transfer to theMove Ahead WA AccountâState. . . .(($212,000,000))$186,784,000(b) The amount authorized in this subsection is a maximum amount allowed and represents proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861. Transfers under this subsection are deemed for projects or improvements identified as transportation 2003 (nickel) projects or improvements for purposes of RCW 47.10.861. Appropriations in the amount of this transfer are made in this act to reflect proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.(((5) Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital ConstructionAccountâState. . . .$40,000,000))(6) Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)âStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$9,000,000(((6)))(7) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$172,000,000(((7) Move Ahead WA AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationPartnership AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000))(8) Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move AheadWA AccountâState. . . .$192,000,000(9) Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Preserve WashingtonAccountâState. . . .$230,000,000(((9)))(10) Pilotage AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Multimodal TransportationAccountâState. . . .$320,000(((10)))(11) Transportation Infrastructure AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to theMultimodal Transportation AccountâState. . . ..$9,000,000(((11)))(12) Regional Mobility Grant Program AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the MultimodalTransportation AccountâState. . . .(($9,000,000))$31,000,000(((12)))(13) Electric Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to Move Ahead WAFlexible AccountâState. . . .$3,600,000(((13)))(14)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement ProjectAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theTransportation Partnership AccountâState. . . .$22,896,000(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).(((14)))(15) Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .(($88,000,000))$83,000,000(((15)))(16) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the County Arterial PreservationAccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(((16)))(17) Motor Vehicle AccountâState Appropriation:For transfer to the Freight Mobility InvestmentAccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(((17)))(18) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural ArterialTrust AccountâState. . . .$4,844,000(((18)))(19) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationImprovement AccountâState. . . .$9,688,000(((19)))(20) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State PatrolHighway AccountâState. . . .$130,000,000(((20) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Capital VesselReplacement AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000))(21) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the CRAB Emergency LoanAccountâState. . . .$3,000,000(((21)))(22) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundCapital Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,500,000(((22)))(23) Motor Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundFerry Operations AccountâState. . . .(($15,000,000))$10,000,000(((23)))(24) Puget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .$115,315,000(((24)))(25) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to the MotorVehicle AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000(((25)))(26) State Route Number 520 Civil PenaltiesAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer to theState Route Number 520 Corridor AccountâState. . . .$1,752,000(((26)))(27) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAFlexible AccountâState. . . .$18,770,000(((27)))(28) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget SoundFerry Operations AccountâState. . . .(($64,000,000))$39,000,000(((28)))(29) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Complete StreetsGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$14,670,000(((29)))(30) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Freight MobilityMultimodal AccountâState. . . .$8,511,000(((30)))(31) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound CapitalConstruction AccountâState. . . .(($105,000,000))$80,000,000(((31)))(32) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Regional MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$27,679,000(((32)))(33) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Rural MobilityGrant Program AccountâState. . . .$12,223,000(((33) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the TransportationPartnership AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000))(34) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$55,000,000(35) Multimodal Transportation AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Preserve WashingtonAccountâState. . . .$107,000,000(((34)))(36) Carbon Emissions Reduction AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound FerryOperations AccountâState. . . .$4,200,000(((35)))(37)(a) General Fund AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol HighwayAccountâState. . . .$625,000(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds under this subsection only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207 ((of this act)), chapter 416, Laws of 2025.(((36)))(38)(a) Highway Safety AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Driver EducationSafety Improvement AccountâState for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$2,000,000(b) Driver Education Safety ImprovementAccountâState Appropriation: For transfer tothe Highway Safety AccountâState for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,000,000(39) JUDY Transportation Future Funding Program AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Motor VehicleAccountâState. . . .$5,000,000(End of part)COMPENSATION(End of part)IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONSSec. 601. 2025 c 416 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: MANAGEMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FUNDS WHEN THE LEGISLATURE IS NOT IN SESSION(1) The 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements, 2015 connecting Washington projects or improvements, and move ahead WA projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-1))2026-1 as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over multiple biennia. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a six-year plan. The department of transportation is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account, connecting Washington account, and move ahead WA account projects on the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. For the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of the office of financial management may provide written authorization for a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation partnership account appropriations, connecting Washington account appropriations, or move ahead WA account appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;(c) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed in the current fiscal biennium;(d) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;(e) Transfers to a project may not occur if that project is a programmatic funding item described in broad general terms on the applicable project list without referencing a specific state route number;(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;(g) Transfers to a project may not be made with funds designated as attributable to practical design savings as described in RCW 47.01.480;(h) The total amount of transfers under this section may not exceed $100,000,000;(i) Except as otherwise provided in (k) of this subsection, transfers made to a single project may not cumulatively total more than $50,000,000 per fiscal biennium, and may not total more than the amount identified for a project within the six-year plan;(j) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of the office of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature; and(k) Transfers between projects may be made by the department of transportation without the formal written approval provided under this subsection (1), provided that the transfer amount to a single project does not exceed $250,000 or 10 percent of the total project per fiscal biennium, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of the office of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.(2) The department of transportation must submit quarterly all transfers authorized under this section in the transportation executive information system. The office of financial management must maintain a legislative baseline project list identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and update that project list with all authorized transfers under this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current fiscal biennium.(3) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature.(4) Before approval, the office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner and address any concerns raised by the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees.(5) No fewer than 10 days after the receipt of a project transfer request, the director of the office of financial management must provide written notification to the department of any decision regarding project transfers, with copies submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.(6) The department must submit annually as part of its budget submittal a report detailing all transfers made pursuant to this section, including any effects to the total project budgets and schedules beyond the current fiscal biennium.Sec. 602. 2025 c 416 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: TRANSIT, BICYCLE, AND PEDESTRIAN ELEMENTS REPORTINGBy November 15th of each year, the department of transportation must report on amounts expended to benefit transit, bicycle, or pedestrian elements within all connecting Washington projects in programs I, P, and Z identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 602, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.Sec. 603. 2025 c 416 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: LOCAL PARTNER COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS(1) If a transportation project, where the Washington state department of transportation is the lead and the project is scheduled to be delivered or completed in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as shown on the LEAP Transportation Document ((2025-2))2026-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026, is in jeopardy of being delayed because the department is unable to deliver or complete the project within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and other local jurisdictions are able to deliver or complete the work, the department must coordinate with the appropriate local jurisdictions to determine if a potential local partner is ready, willing, and able to execute delivery and completion of the project within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(2) The department must compile a list of projects under this section, including the timing under which the local partner agency can deliver or complete the projects within the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 fiscal biennia. The department must submit the compiled list of projects to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025.(End of part)MISCELLANEOUS 2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMSec. 701. 2025 c 416 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHTThe following transportation projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 (2) through (12), chapter 424, Laws of 2025 (omnibus operating appropriations act): For the department of transportation: Washington state ferries dispatch system replacement ((and)); Washington state ferries ticketing and reservations modernization; the transportation reporting and accounting information system (TRAINS) upgrade; PROPEL â WSDOT support of one Washington; and capital systems replacement.Sec. 702. RCW 36.78.130 and 2019 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board may create an emergency revolving loan program that is self-supporting in accordance with RCW 43.88.190. The board may award emergency loans to counties with a population of less than eight hundred thousand as of April 1, 2019, from the funds available in the county road administration board emergency loan account created in RCW 36.78.135 for emergency projects. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the board may award emergency loans to counties and cities that experienced flooding, landslides, and other infrastructure damage as a result of historically high rainfall levels in western Washington in December 2025, regardless of population size.(2) Emergency projects are work of either a temporary or permanent nature which restores roads and bridges to a preemergency condition and may include reconstruction to current design standards. This work is the result of a sudden natural or man-made event which results in the destruction or severe damage to county roadway sections or structures such that, in the consideration of public safety and use, the roadway sections or structures must be immediately closed or substantially restricted to normal use. Work of an emergency nature is also beyond the scope of work done by a county in repairing damages normally or reasonably expected from seasonal or other natural conditions, and is beyond what would be considered maintenance.(3) In order to obtain a loan under this section, there must be a county, state, or federal emergency proclamation declaring an emergency related to the event that caused the damage the emergency project intends to correct, and the county must agree to repay the loan with interest of not more than three percent. All repayment amounts must be deposited into the county road administration board emergency loan account.(4) Any work performed on an emergency project funded in accordance with this section by county forces shall be exempt from the limits of RCW 36.77.065.(5) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the board must submit a report to the legislature by December 1st of each even-numbered year identifying each project that received money from the county road administration board emergency loan account, the amount of the loan, the expected repayment terms of the loan, the expected date of repayment, and the loan repayment status. Each project should be reported about until the loan is repaid.Sec. 703. RCW 46.68.396 and 2022 c 182 s 435 are each amended to read as follows:The JUDY transportation future funding program account is created in the connecting Washington account established in chapter 44, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for preservation projects, to accelerate the schedule of connecting Washington projects identified in chapter 43, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., for new connecting Washington projects, and for principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects. It is the legislature's intent that moneys not be appropriated from the account until 2024 and that moneys in the account be expended in equal amounts between preservation and improvement projects. Moneys in the account may not be expended on the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the JUDY transportation future funding program account to the motor vehicle account.Sec. 704. RCW 46.68.520 and 2022 c 182 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:The move ahead WA flexible account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for transportation projects, programs, or activities identified as move ahead WA projects, programs, or activities in an omnibus transportation appropriations act. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the move ahead WA flexible account to the preserve Washington account created in chapter . . ., Laws of 2026 (HB 2711).(End of part)2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMMISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 801. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 802. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.(End of part)--- END ---